I have been prisoner of the Strones barbarians since their raid on my hometown before winter. They dragged me in combat and raids all winter forcing me to use my healing abilities to help them.   Suddenly, in the middle of the forest they notice a group is following us. The Strones get cover for an ambush and tie me to a tree. The new group is small, but I soon realize they are very powerful. The barbarians get overwhelmed and retreat, leaving me tied to the tree. I get rescued by this new group of fighters and mages and they ask me if I want to join them. They are on their way to fight the barbarians and send them back to their lands. I am dazed, barely able to believe I am safe and free, but I decide to join them, where else could I go?.   I spend the trip aiding my saviors the best I can with my healing, still in shock and trembling most of the time. We attack the barbarians, free a couple of other slaves. But as we progress, the group realize that they are A LOT more barbarians then they tough. Its not just little villages like mine that are in danger, the army of barbarians is so big that they pose a treat to the whole kingdom. They offer me to go back to their town, were they will organize their defenses for the summer.
Yeah.  Here is a top view of the green vs the yellow.  Green was a cabernet sauvignon from Chile and the yellow was a twist top shiraz from Australia.  Both wines were less than $10U.S. however the bottle quality is vastly different.   http://imgur.com/zb9tPGN
So grab a towel and settle in for a great game.
Pick #3 Morphling.
I think they're implying that their toilets are disgusting.  Chick is hovering, and the dude is standing as far back from the urinal as possible. 
Hello
&gt; Academic deception is fine to these charlatans, just as long as it furthers The Agenda.  Yes... that's part and parcel of "postmodernism", the (so called) philosophical underpinning of feminism, socialism, multiculturalism -- per postmodernism there is no such thing as objective reality, it's all perceptions and moreover "feelings"; and in addition language is all "social construct" and subjective... so that they not only see nothing "wrong" (and the very concept of right/wrong is dismissed/redefined/distorted) with rewriting history, but they also *aren't* doing it in order to "correct" it (i.e. to eliminate previous bias towards some objective version), but to simply "fictionalize" it... because so long as lots of people "believe" something to have happened a certain way, well from the social-power perspective that is a FAR more important goal or purpose, and in the end ALL that matters to them.  Once you comprehend that... then you comprehend that they not only "lie" regularly, and inconsistently... but that they have so "seared" their consciences, that they really *aren't capable* of anything else, they truly CANNOT engage in logical &amp; rational thought about an objective reality: because they have denied the existence of all of those concepts.
I used to be Diamond 2 last season and now i just can't get out of D5 because of this, i mean, i play for fun and to get better, but the fact i losse like 30 lp it's kinda shitty lol I don't think Riot is going to fix it and yes, you can get out if you keep playng, but the amount of frustration you can get is really high.
*gasp!*  You must be running SS13 on a supercomputer!
[I like Eva version better](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hbkJvwA44ks)
Can I get an actual source in this? Not from a website that cites a Facebook post as news?
It's been a bad winter up here. People are loosing their minds on this island.  According to the local paper it wasn't stolen. Just owned by an idiot.
The new design's going to take some getting used to.  One thing I miss is the "Top Performers" of the night that used to be on the top right of the scores page. I know they have top performers for each game, now, but it's not the same, and also means we don't have the top points/assists/rebounds for each game broken out, anymore.
I was always confused why the subset operator is used in different ways. It already looks similar to less-than and less-or-equal-than, so why would people use ⊂ for subset-or-equal?
Actually the warriors are in the film, but M. Night wisely cut them from the final cut and decided that if it didnt make it in the theatrical release then it dosent deserve to be on the deleted scenes in the dvd.  http://vignette1.wikia.nocookie.net/avatar/images/8/87/Film_-_Kyoshi_Warriors.png/revision/latest?cb=20140419093745  It was a gutsy move considering they were in the posters for the film, but it worked out in the end. 
I'm hoping it's similar to the team orangred vs periwinkle catastrophe  that happened a few years ago. Last year's head motions to control reddit were a little meh, only due to the fact it kept registering my ears as two individual heads.
FUCK THAT'S NASTY DUDE
*Furiously hitting reply...*
Distrust is okay, purposely breaking a boundary (like going through my things or snooping into my peeps) is a dealbreaker just because if things are that messed up and fragile its not going to work out.
Good luck to you! I hope it all works out. Just remember, your siblings and others on that side of the family have been hurt badly by your mother and will naturally be cautious. Try to be patient with them. They will need time to be able to trust that you aren't like your mother and won't lie to them.
Eh? Is there a joke I'm not getting?
since you've helped out in the swagbucks community... i'll help out with this... 
I know that deck. It's pretty sick at making money. Shaper cheats also help. 
What's wrong with having music in the background? And both consoles have loads of entertainment options, just that MS were at E3 talking about mostly TV and sports like that's what people want the system for.
I like pretty much every change they made. They lowered the points for winning LANs a bit too much, but overall I think this is a pretty good structure.
Sort of like saying when a man beats his wife if she resists then she's equally culpable.  
Same same :/ the hair isn't even too bad for me, the hair on my face is moreso peach fuzz and I have super light body hair so I don't even care much. the acne just makes me really upset though..like..I'm 21..if I was going to have acne in my life WHY COULDNT IT HAVE BEEN AS A TEENAGER WHERE AT LEAST EVERYONE ELSE HAD IT TOO D:
As much as I know that it'll be Sabo in the end... I would love to see Garp to kill him.... I feel like it would be such an amazing fight and a battle of pure strength.... Mainly, I want to see how much power Garp really has 
www.stratroulette.com Have a look! : ) Hope you enjoyed the video too! &lt;3
Did anyone else feel like each kid represented a different time period?   Paul felt  early sixties, Jay felt late seventies, Hugh felt 2000's, Greg felt 80's, Kelly felt 90's, and Yara felt like near future.  
Paw*
Eddie Izzard, Dressed to Kill:  The careers advisor used to come to school.  He'd tell the kids, "I advise you to get a career, what can I say?"  He took me aside and said, "Tell me your dreams."  "I want to be an astronaut, discover new things." He said, "Look, you're British, so scale it down a bit."  "All right, I want to work in a shoe shop, then. Discover shoes that no one's ever discovered in the back of the shop."  "Look, you're British, so scale it down a bit."  "All right, I want to work in a sewer, then.  And discover sewage no one's ever discovered and pile it on my head, surface and sell myself to an art gallery."
Hoa's are usually run by people with nothing better to do.  I was fined for having my car detailed in my driveway. Apparently a detail us "extensive work"  So when the HOA people did their daily stroll I setup my table, brought out my cleaning supplies and cleaned my firearms in gm driveway facing them as they walked by.  Greeted each of them and told them to have a "niiiiiicccceeeeeeee daaaay" as I let the bolt slam home on my M1....  My fine was refunded
But can he score points?
FYI the raw edges of the fabric will curl under the second you wash the shirt, so make sure to cut the fabric a little wider, especially on thin parts like the straps.
Also, people who use the sinks have already used the bathroom. So they have pissed or shit then put their hands on the knobs for the sink to wash their hands. So if you wash your hands then just touch the knobs, you are getting all that bacteria from them on your hands. 
Yussssssssss.
implications.
They do now. Mexican delivery boys are everywhere these days in area that aren't saturated by the local gangs already. They come in and flood the market with void cheap tar, helps that they have a penchant for free samples. There may be hope yet.
go ded void. Pls go ded ;w;
Jeez even Melnyk didn't do that
Spelt, kamut flours taste great, but don't have the best bread making properties. I have also heard that soft white is rather uncommon. I am not sure if it's just the flour I use but I think the soft white can pick up the smell and flavor of  other plants it's grown near like  alfalfa. Have some now that smells like sunflowers/dandelions.   Anybody else have this experience with flours? 
No mention of Spartan Browser though, too soon for that I guess.
Someone said that Johnny Cage could potentially be the Big Bad (which would really be out of left field), due to some stuff that goes on in Chapter 1.  I'm no longer thinking Shinnok, and I was never really into the idea of Liu Kang being the FB. If it ends up being Shao Khan, that'll just be really lazy.  Right now, my hope is that it will be Reiko.
As an American where it's not yet April Fool's Day, this confused me greatly for far too long. 
Chronicle 
http://imgur.com/cRL9CBi  Because I can. 
Did the same myself sir, I found multitasking easier as I'm not jumping bezels with my windows, colors are the same for Adobe work and my desk is small so I have more space for all my nerd collections.  Welcome to the 21:9 club. Enjoy Civ5 and FPS's. :)
Good points, definitely don't have direct experience with E36 maintenance so this is good information.
The best answer I've ever heard to a "thank you for your service" was "my pleasure". Try that out.
What's so funny about this is this is basically everything Nintendo needs to do to start turning a profit again, it's like they are stuck in the nineties and every other company passed them by and adapted to the changing landscape
this is romo paraphrasing, it might not be exactly what demarco said.
It also makes him look quite similar to his actor, Paul Bettany, in some ways.
Nah, I don't think this show would succumb to repeating the same plot line only 2 episodes later. 
Take the Trib link, put it into a Google search, click the top link. 
HYPE.  As said as Hai leaving, think of it like this.  Adding Bjerg made TSM NA's top-class.  Adding Incarnati0n to C9?  Oh baby the skill-ceiling just got so much higher for an already monstrous team.  
i don't fully understand what you're saying... mind explaining?  also, could the 2 controllers have been made to work under the same API or is there an issue with patents and legal business?
Nah, It'd be seriously broken if that was the case. Considering the 'combo' would automatically take advantage of this anyway.
I don't understand the post, do we not always shit post all we want?
I'll be able to link it here on Thursday. That's when I have my Photoshop class at school. I can re-size it then, and put it here after.
and Raiders QBs.
Going by the commercials you'd never know that Hamil isn't the only Trickster tonight
Hit up nike.com on launch day and got lucky. Ended up with 11's but needed a 10.5 unfortunately. 
 I deposited a lvl 17 Zubat my ot fleepter i need Seedot  thanks :)
Anyone else find it weird that word Official is in quotes in the title of the stream?
This thread has been linked to from another place on reddit.  - [/r/conspiracy] [Top post on reddit at the moment, is about a brave bus driver that gets hit by a metal object and safely pulls bus over saving the passengers, my question is how come it has 3000+ upvotes, but the youtube link has only 301 views?](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/30zmhp/top_post_on_reddit_at_the_moment_is_about_a_brave/)   [](#footer)*^If ^you ^follow ^any ^of ^the ^above ^links, ^respect ^the ^rules ^of ^reddit ^and ^don't ^vote. ^\([Info](/r/TotesMessenger/wiki/) ^/ ^[Contact](/message/compose/?to=\/r\/TotesMessenger))* [](#bot)
I remember this. I kept telling my husband that it was a joke and that there was no way an email provider was going to offer a gig for free.
I've taken shits with more resolution than this picture! 
wow shots are 9-1
Your relationship with the Assassin Brotherhood had decreased from 1 to -3.
The f u on bout boy
I just farmed a chameleos for its armor and it was an IG/CB/SA quest so it didn't take me much time. The quest needs to be higher than 126 level wise.
Well I would love to but we share a room and I don't want him to feel bad about it. 
Sheldon richerdson
I don't get why jax is in a jungle though 
Theres a picture of Jonah Hex in the thumbnail, but I cant find that image on the page.
Might be an April 1st joke.
My brother is afraid of snakes. He says they make his spine crawl. Snakes are crawling spines.
&gt;Being sich != holiday  Being yourself is not a holiday?  Jeez, what kind of company do you work for that forbids you to have your own personality?  ;)
I'm pretty sure that this moment was ruined for me by Jerry Lawler saying "HAHA! This is a Wrestlemania moment, guys!  Thanks Jerry, totally added to the atmosphere. Being told that it was an important moment.  Just like how they were talking over the NWO entrance. Let some damn things have their natural effects. Stop talking over every, damn thing! I hate commentary, seriously. Despite all of Vince's triumphs and failures, how he's transformed commentary is probably the worst thing he's done to modern professional wrestling.  My friends and I were noticing during the Sting-HHH match that they only called about 4 moves, Pedigree, Stinger Splash, Scorpion Death Lock/Drop. That's it. Otherwise, they were talking about how much the match meant and whatnot on REPEAT.  Shit, sorry for this rant. I know we all know it, but seeing this pic reminded me and pissed me off.
&gt;In video games, an exploit is the use of a bug or glitches, game system, rates, hit boxes, or speed  Do you see the "OR" there? Yes, an EXPLOIT is something that isn't intended by the developers. Wavedashing is an EXPLOIT, but not a BUG. A bug isn't the same as an exploit (even though a bug is also something that is unintended).  They even mention wavedashing in that article:   &gt;Taking advantage of the systems that make up the gameplay. A game mechanics exploit is not a bug—it is working as designed, but at the same time is not working as intended. An example is the "wavedash" in Super Smash Bros. Melee
I'm guessing Mars.
Put 3 of four players in the legion of boom in the operating table
The show is worth watching too, for those who haven't seen it.
no worries you just saved your self from having to deal with that flaming pyle seagate 
病んでたのか
How did Cleary get an A? We're down so many people?
Sad as it is, at his level you can get dimes by the dozen. 
This one really shows the ttc rent a cop escalating the situation. I hope both of these dipshits lose their jobs and get charged. 
Makes Skybase more like towers :D ***#SkybaseMasterRace***
Further proof that Guti will be starting in CF by June.
I'm an only child. I grew up with a working dad and an ill mum who were fighting quite often. On the other side of the road, there was another family. They had two girls, one year and six years younger than me.  I consider these girls my sisters and their parents mean just as much, maybe more, to ne than my actual ones. I spent every free second of my childhood there. They're my idea of what a family should look like. Over time, we grew aparta bit. I still see them, but not half as often as I'd like go. When I see them it's a bit weird, because it's not what it was. But then still, there are things like their mum remembering what kinds of food I liked or disliked when I was younger, noticing all changes, ever so slight, while my mum never even knew when I got out of school. I miss them like hell. All of them. And I have no idea what I can do about it.
If this was the first or second time he's been accused of planting evidence and there is no substantial evidence to back it up, I'd give him the benefit of the doubt, but he has previously lied under oath and planted evidence in a wrongful death and civil rights violation which resulted in a $50K settlement. I am inclined to believe the accusation has some merit.
I can't go much higher than $200
Dark Energy
Keep an eye on massdrop.com. They use plain boxes and sell all kinds of stuff but you may have to wait a little longer to receive. They get with a vendor for an agreed upon sale price if they can find enough buyer to commit. You have to wait for drop to end and then it's a matter of drop ship or Massdrop receiving then shipping. 
Where are you splashing?
LGR!
Chandler Jones
First time I've seen a Unidan joke that's about the vote-fixing instead of the Jackdaw rant.
Please no gold digger mentions, please no gold digger mentions, please no gold digger mentions... ooh, so close.
On the right there's a link to the synergy info, but basically items and characters get a bonus when used on their home world.  The kunai is just an example of how a simple common 1* weapon when fully combined and upgraded with the synergy bonus can be as good as a 4* weapon.
What did you use to apply the pressure? Or was that just your own full weight? 
I've seen a short LP of it.  It is borderline unplayable with the shittiness and complexity of the motion controls.
 ヘ（。□°）ヘ  reality is warping around the dong   ヘ（。□°）ヘ
No, no. The woman in the last picture (and the human in the first photo?? not sure) is Charlotte Wessels of the band Delain. She wasn't even remotely close to fat before, though she seems to have lost a little bit of weight.  I'm still confused, too, even though I recognize the last photo..
He collapses in a heap. Luckily, nobody's about.
He's thinking about her wanting a popcorn machine for the bar that he works at, but she's really telling him that her friend (Cece), likes him.
There's also a two-part graphic novel version of Wagner's Ring cycle ([part 1](http://www.darkhorse.com/Books/11-532/The-Ring-of-the-Nibelung-Vol-1-The-Rhinegold-The-Valkyrie) [part 2](http://www.darkhorse.com/Books/11-724/The-Ring-of-the-Nibelung-Vol-2-Siegfried-Gotterdammerung-The-Twilight-of-the-Gods) links are to publisher's website).
...the piston. The piston needs them.
Add oWNxbyxAxNOOb lvl32 titan truth
There really might be a club near you.
I watched 2 guys 1 hammer when I was younger , I couldn't , and wouldn't watch that these days . Disgusting , puke material 
Can you not?
Just got it and my bank account is now crying... *hold me* but my lil creative heart cannot wait to tear apart those peach shades ugh 
Bring back SWAT :(
:)
I like my Porter Cable "sidewinder". If you are right handed you can get one with the blade on the left side for better view of the cut. I too do not enjoy handling heavy worm drives
Do you have a source for this? I'm not implying that you are wrong, I 'm just curious.
Murder a molecule.
Hey! Could you send me some pics bud? I may be interested
(No problem)  "A strike? Huh. That might just work. It won't since all our problems, but it might just be the stepping stone we need. Thank you friend, thank you for unifying my people. I'll start organizing right away." He gives you a quick hug and heads to the back room.
You'll get no argument from me on that.
To be honest, I was being somewhat sarcastic and not entirely unbiased in the earlier comment. Of the various options, such as legislation and policy, I don't think there's much better approach here other than to recognize and avail ourselves of the information about the market situation around us. The way I view it is that fundamentally, both the incumbent homeowner class who created the value and real estate to begin with, as well as the government agencies determining the immigration policy, have decided that it was good to "cash in". By that I mean that the two groups (probably, quite rationally!) chose to exploit the market forces and capitalize on the real estate demand as well as abundance of qualified and valuable immigration candidates on the human resource market. So while the "local" gen-X and gen-Y'ers have the generally accepted experience and perception of having to compete harder to become home owners, and generally to "make it", the bigger picture is that we are going through a market adjustment, and ultimately going through the tough times right now positions Canada as a more competitive and equalized player on the global scene.   Tl;dr: to me, this is all fruits of globalization, viewed from the vantage point of a "yuppie" Canadian. On the positive note, the quicker the poor countries' quality of living catches up to being comparable with first world/Canada and US, the sooner things are likely to ease up for everyone.
Yeah, I have about 100 pages left. I read 4 pages and fall asleep so I am going at it slowly too. I read too late.
That does not look safe.  Nope, definitely not safe.  This must not be the U.S.A.  We have our issues to be sure, but sending dudes up on sick ass long ladders with (what seems like) a lack of safety gear to change out an air conditioner doesn't seem like our thing. 
He shakes his hand before sitting next to him.  "It's a pleasure to meet you Jason. What are you doing over here?"
Yeah, in this period in Northern Europe, we're talking tribes running around.  "Royal" meant chieftain of the tribe.  He and maybe the most badass of his warband might have something like this, or the Sutton Hoo helmet.
If we can keep them off the board will come to play in the last 12 minutes of the third and win it. If we can't will start playing as soon as they take the lead but never actually do enough to win. 
Nope.
Condolences.
Depends on insertions, muscle belly lengths, bone sizes, arm length to body, lots of stuff. If you're natty and you stand next to someone who is on dat der celltech, you will almost never look decent. But on your own or with other natty's, dyel's, or normal people, you will look pretty dang good with 16-17inch arms, which I believe for the most part is the upper echelon of size under 10%bf for a non enhanced lifter, probably 18inch if above 6'4. Again it depends, easy example: Steve Cook's biceps versus Zyzz's biceps (insertions, not even the tri's)
Hey CMU here also!
[] (/ppoops) whoops.   Then, probably either jt the Fox or Mary the mare. 
tbh, conor wants this, more money. It is so disrepectful, but its all anyone will talk about. 
Jesus, Brook, don't kill their hopes and dreams, too. 
Ehh, it's tough. I'd probably get the $100 one. Just due to how parts vary so widely in price and having the leisure of it at your fingertips is pretty sweet.
1. Entirely different type of herpes than what she's thinking. 2. She's psycho.
I'm not, so there are likely people like me who stopped originally because they didn't want to get slapped with a $500 fine
Dragonhields have the Fusion sleeves. It's like a shade of red, don't know what it is exactly. Anyway, it's name suites the color combo (5 color = fusion, bonus points if you run [[Fusion Elemental]] for pauper).
The most expensive tooth brush I have ever seen was $120, and I thought that was overprised.
**Attention!** Please keep in mind that the OP of this thread has chosen to mark this post with the **[Serious] replies only** tag, therefore [any replies that are jokes, puns, off-topic, or are otherwise non-contributory will be removed](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_--.5Bserious.5D_tags--).  If you see others posting comments that violate this tag, please report them to the mods!   Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Feather: I know that much. C'mon, tell me. Did I do something wrong?
The game is extremely complicated and when you go on vacation you're completely giving up that control over those variables.  Just don't go on vacation! In the settings/preferences you can set things like "Reject all trades when on vacation", etc.  
DEADMAN9293, 32 Hunter or Lock, Maxed Gjallarhorn, Can relic beard, Pretty good looking :-) 
You'll love it. My best friend has one on his Hog Hunter. When the BSA isn't on sale, it's the best budget optic by far.
Well, I have only 58% pdr as I have no idea how to raise it aside from losing range and the lumi link skill.
What I mean is it reinforces the notion that we can have awful candidates and they will still get voted in. 
Also, unless you find a cheap but good one that works with your skin chemistry, screening through a bunch of cheapies gets pretty expensive unless the process of trying a bunch of cheap stuff is what you like to do.
as a supporter of the native Robins -- Fuck Starlings
that was very good actually.
Almost everyone gets bloody field triage. Its the worst. I got it on freaking Kana!
Get 20XX
Sex before sports actually increases testosterone levels and potentially improves performance. Either way, if you have a chance to sleep with Hank, jump on that. 
I guess you have to take my word for it if you're not willing to look into it on your own, but they're the same law. 
*cue intense music*
So this is going to be like slow-mo league with DotA2 cool downs and ability costs?
I put some speed on mine (only got to 150-ish because I'm a noob), and saw a minimal increase in damage. Read a few times elsewhere that the description was wrong and that it doesn't scale with speed at all. Starting to believe it.
Yes it does, what?  Get what for free?  
That's also what I was thinking of.  Also, have had [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ffMnKoHPUKw)stuck in my head all day. 
Sorry, don't think I could do that.
Cue the end of season winning streak 
&amp; the majority are from the same fucking dot.
Finally answered Sheriff Bart's question. 
Good taste.
Great now everyone is gonna see the leafs are up and everyone is gonna trickle on over here and blow up our shit. To those of you who didn't/ won't make playoffs...ZAPPITY ZAP MOTHERFUCKERS
Check out both teams to score next time. Been testing with small stakes but was hitting consistently. At least this round of fixtures
Take a step back and evaluate yourself honestly. I have seen severely handicapped guys in wheelchairs hook up with very attractive women. Learning how to socialize won't only help your love life, it will improve your work relationships and make you a more complete person. Learning how to socialize better can improve everyone's life, even I can use some improvement. I know this probably sounds patronizing, but please look into it. It can be very rewarding.
Sad... No ears and no nose HEHE :o) poof!  Edit auto correct; poof, not poor.
&gt;Both the drivers and cyclists need to be targeted it is sadly, often looked downipon to even hint that the cyclists might have been at fault in accidents with vehicles.  I'd say it's probably looked down upon because it's almost always brought up as a way to move blame onto a cyclist when it's unwarranted, to shift the discussion away from road safety for vulnerable users (people like to say "cyclists should be accountable too!") and ultimately it's not a helpful or useful conversation, and because so many of the cycling deaths happen to experienced cyclists who probably WEREN'T at fault.   Not to mention when we start discussing HOW to educate cyclists, it usually comes down to doing it through school programs for kids (get 'em while they're young) and of course, folks don't like the idea of spending money to achieve results. So the discussion really just goes nowhere or in circles if we're lucky.
&gt;Clerical Fascists acknowledge the nation as having a place of importance, unlike ISIS.  ISIS seeks to establish a Global, Totalitarian, Islamic State, as supported by your statement here:  &gt; and replace them with a single religious entity, the Caliphate.  ------- &gt;unlike ISIS, which supports religion over the nation,  Except Islam is more of a Totalitarian political doctrine than it is a religion (pro-tip: all religions are wealthy cults, and all of them can and historically have functioned as prototypes to modern Political Parties). It's a religion the way Nazism is a religion, with the Quran instead of Mein Kampf.  &gt;In both Iraq and Syria they are engaged militarily by Ba'athists, I'm not convinced they agree on much.  Irrelevant. I was talking about the original Ba'athist current of thought, not the current division between Iraqi and Syrian Ba'athism.  &gt;I'm not convinced of this, I think they more closely line up with orthodox Fascism combined with pan-Arabism.  Meanwhile, it's a fact that Ba'athism is Arabic Nationalism and Arabic Socialism, with Saddam Hussein's variant taking open inspiration from Hitlerism and Stalinism.  &gt;Secularism is fairly important to Ba'athism, so this would make their philosophy not Ba'athism.  Right, except for what I said about *re-installing Islam into Ba'athist (Pan-Arabic) Nationalist Socialism, and transforming it back into Wahhabism*.
In Miami, it's mostly chains like Pita Pit and Gyroville. There are a few smaller places, but not anywhere near where I lived 
Thankyou. That doesn't seem nearly as scary as what I was thinking. Internet has ruined me.
I'm 110% certain it's ghosts.
In a hopeless place.
Yes, I recognize myself in this.  It also depends on what system you use. Some systems assume that you've more prop work than others.  A lot of anxeity can be lessened as you progressively master the rule-set.  And, also... Don't sweat it. You will make mistakes, it's just part of learning. Just have fun along the way.
You may be interested in the New America Series by Richard Stephenson basically what happens its the year 2027 America is in the Second Great Depression Iran is running the ME due to expanding its borders and spheres of influence this all happens and then theirs a coup d'etat in the US from members in the US government they form an isolationist haven killing millions of Americans. It's a good read. 
No, a public business (also known as a "public accommodation") is one that is *open* to the public. A private business (also known as a "private club") is open only to a private group. The latter can discriminate, while the former cannot.
From the promos to me it seems like he's gonna use something similar to the same voice he does for the Joker.
Why is that? I'm just curious :)
Update looks amazing can't wait to try out the new stuff :D
It's nice to know that I have at least one fan.
This is the part where I back away slowly.
I haven't bought music since I got Spotify.
Booooooooooo! Party pooper!!!!.... 
I agree, the holding mechanic works great with the warlock hero power as does the text on the two headed thing. I'm envisioning a super greedy Dragon and demon deck in my near future. 
He's embellishing. They are pretending to be catty with each other I think.
18, New Zealand.  The character design i'm not too fond of. The personality isn't great like OG Dante but it has some potential to grow I guess.
[Similar to this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j3uIo3SZAyI) It would help a little I guess. (I don't play graves but this is something OP is looking for.)
nice post
Good to know, comes up so infrequently though. 600 m is a long way.
They haven't been a fan that long.   God every frame still hurts.  Edit: I knew I'd get downvoted still too salty to pass it up.   (Originally came here to make sure Greg Jennings didn't)
These are the facts: GMC originally made the pickup and Chevy re badged it, Chevy sales grew far beyond GMC's and Chevy could lower the pick up price do to volume. The price difference today is about 1%. ($500 difference on a $50,000 truck) The GMC Sierra &amp; Chevy Silverado are EXACTLY the same truck (except for the grill &amp; head lights and rear bed fenderwells). The Sierra &amp; Silverado are built on the same assembly line at the same time. There is NOT ONE option on either truck that is not available on the other truck. The option package(s) are just renamed (SLT vs LTZ). GMC markets as Professional Grade and Up Scale just to be different, which is a marketing illusion. Recently the high end GMC Denali &amp; Chevy High Country have started offering different interior choices but still use the exact same seat bases &amp; wiring harness. If you go online &amp; build a GMC &amp; Chevy you will see exactly the same choices. When GM re-organized in 2008 GMC was considered being knocked off but that would have made all the GMC dealers now Chevy dealers and that would have screwed up the dealer locations (too many Chevy dealers on the same block) so GMC remained. The GMC &amp; Chevy part numbers are the SAME numbers in the parts catalog ! In the 1980's GMC &amp; Chevy BOTH made the Suburban because it was so popular they both wanted the sales market. Years ago GMC made large tractor trailer haulers but no longer dominate the market, though they still build them. Cadillac Escalade use the GM truck frame but has exclusive engines (more HP), transmissions, bodies, interiors ... (truly upscale) and those Cadillac innovations end up in the high end GMC &amp; Chevy trucks as the Caddy upgrades over the years.
Humor, intelligence, common interests, sex, everything else...in that order
Same here!
I felt like the "swollen" adjective was due to the pre-eclampsia, just like they had difficulty intubating her due to the swelling and obesity, which were listed separately there.
That page is a better presentation than the video alone.
&gt; Is there a possibility of more gox coins being returned in more wholeness than previouisly thought.  No.  &gt;possible return of gox?  You can totally trust Karpeles with your millions, I'm sure he'd love that opportunity.
As long as it makes everyone feel a little dirty denying that man a remarkable reception, then I think everyone has reconciled their differences.
Yeah, it's great to also be reading this nosleep submission while in the backseat of a Comfort Delgro ah... 
You did 2 quotation mark in the beginning and end. If have 2 of them in notepad aswell, change it. If not, I have no idea, sorry man.
Yeah, that's pretty much how I reacted when I said the word, heard myself saying it, realized what I had just said and then saw her reaction to it.
Where's this from?
That was my first thought, if you replace the hearts with sheepstick stats and remove the 2% it's much less than using hearts and going off of pure hp pool.
Really love your body and want to see more of it!
I would have said animal herded and anus gazer would have been more accurate.
Cities: Skylines is better in about every way. If you are looking for a solid city builder then buy it instead of Sim City. 
I signed up and it found nothing about me. I'm extremely open and public to social media and use my real name on most things.  It's strange to not be found at all.
&gt;i know what sounds like a good idea  &gt;i'm gonna be 23 years old and make fun of high school kids for being... well, high school kids!  also you frequent /r/streetwear, you can't talk shit about other subreddits.
ill wait for the free Tidal app....ha!
It's nice to see a (presumably) Indian-based worldbuild. I'm actually working on a South Asian worldbuild on and off.
I have a question: if blood can't reach our second brain, then what keeps our second brain functioning 
Because they deserve it.
Oh yeah I forgot that you use the attacker version now. And your vid quality earns the flattery, keep it up!
I have no shame
...he must be trolling...
Castle Crasher batman costume
You monster! I love you.
The circus where your mom works.
\#Consistency
The light shine test is very good and can be an obvious tip once you know what you are looking at. The blue color and pattern shows though very well and is something I haven't heard of a single counterfeit passing properly.
Ungh yeah...deglaze that pan.
Question. Would you be able to keep your hands off her if she weighed 175? What if she ballooned up to 180-190 and couldn't taper her weight very well? I'm seeing a pattern in here where the happy stories involve a fit wife who takes charge of her health where as most women hit a certain age or have children and it's game over. Sex life fatality.  
Man don't fucking share that shit. Have some respect.
MC Ride, then I'd never know when Jenny Death.
Nothing at all.
I might be interested, what are you looking to get for the lot?
Oh man... I just found out I was pregnant last week! I totally would sign up! 
I enter the PC, making sure the first slot is free for injection. Then, I exit the PC but do not move my character. I immediately move on to the home button, pressing L/R to open the camera, use the QR code button, and watch as the black injection screen tells me the Pokémon has been injected. I then return immediately to my game (the one I'm using is Omega Ruby). 
Isn't there a statute of limitations on theft too?
Welcome to the real world, jackasssss
*He pushes himself back on to the rafters, chuckling.*  It's only one loaf, I'll dry it for you.
Wanna fall into 10th?
I'll fill that ass 
I would go with the PS4. You'll be with your friends, and you could try something new. Maybe find a new game to take Halo's place. Switching things up is the best way not to get bored with gaming. If you stick with Halo all of your life, you will eventually get bored.
omg what is her name lol
Or will it?
Sounds like marketing hype  Modern car companies can make very sophisticated products as fast as the customers buy them  This is an attempt to make the car seem more rare and valuable than it really is, and to justify the high price
"Make game easier please"
OP is a travelling rentboy. I hope he chokes on a bloody chode.
I admire Sam Harris. I cannot stand the blow hard know-it-all numbskull who is 'interviewing' him.
Turn smartcast off and on again (or other way around if you dont use it)  Every time you die mid-ability with an champ, this can happen. The above mentioned is the solution to it 100% of the time.
Not sure ....think this is an old school FX Network commercial.  They are seriously still the funniest.  Google ' FX Funeral' 
NHL: Blackhawks, Blackhawks, Blackhawks.  MLB: Cubs  NBA: Bulls  NFL: Bears.   I'm the definition of a homer
I know I'm going to drive myself crazy being suspicious tomorrow.
i wish i could type phonetically some of the memorable "eew" and "yuck" noises that anthony and, and to his credit, opie made a lot of times during douche/cringe jocktober segments.
"Cool."
The nearest road is like 1000km south. You have to fly in or in some rare instances take a boat. It's very expensive either way. A trip to this region, not including the helicopter, runs about $10k cad. 
I'm with you.  I consider photography as art to be more about the composition, planning, and execution.  I know each style has its place, and I'm not knocking shooting expired film (heck, I'd rather see it exposed than in a landfill somewhere), it doesn't appeal to me.  I prefer the process of shooting film, and I don't have the time, tools, or technique to do my own processing at home.  I wouldn't trust a shop to know when and/or how to process expired film so something useable comes out.  For some, art is a pursuit of something random, something inexplicable or random (there's beauty in chaos sometimes...), but it's not for me.
Great story, great twist.  I want the long version. Not enough upvotes to give.
who's throwing handles?
Our band played Too Close for our closer last year, the sousaphone wub part was kickass.
wtf is going on, Indiana?
This is reason number 1 for me. I don't want to switch out my console every time I'm in the mood for DS 2.
I hope the April Fools joke is that they are making a sequel to that shitbag of a movie.
I hope that with the Giants injuries and struggles this Spring, both the Padres and Dodgers bury them and make it a 2 team race by the ASB
no he said it hadn't left the country that he ordered it from, meaning that it was most likely an international order, not a domestic one...
Indeed.
Omg so adorable!!!  Best of luck to you, someone here should be able to help you soon. 
If anyone has ever used the shower jelly or pudding, please share your experience. That looks too interesting to pass up! :D
How about [Marie](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/e2/05/f0/e205f09d4a21e33f469df1b072ae45f0.jpg)?  A pink-and-white (Neo) cat (Blake) who doesn't start fights but finishes them (Pyrrha)?
You find me a B&amp;M with this price and you'll shock me. Even the fairest B&amp;M's by me want $60 for the iStick full bundle (not the base version) and like $32-$40 for the mini.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gambler%27s_fallacy
It has nothing to do with Alvin Risk, it's called Kamoze Dub
I've underwent the trauma that comes from seeing that thing under a hexproof [[elite arcanist]]. And that was before the tuck rule was changed.
if this is some sort of early april fools joke....
It might be a better tablet, I doubt that it will be more successful. Sony refuses to back their mobile products with decent advertising.
Got to see mites on ice while in Germany, awesome!
Probably easier if you upload this to a google doc- in order to allow people to edit/ help you with your document. 
I doubt it. I imagine it involves a move from East to West. Like, Florida, which would make sense why they have been backing them all this time, just biding it til there is a good time to relocate them. 
Well in America of course. 
Excellent post mash'Allah. However, what would be the point of him doing Wudu, if his prayer isn't accepted?
No but now I am going to! I also need to add [[Venser's Journal]] for another unlimited hand artifact and also the life gain. Probably going to keep it budget for a little while, get some more testing in and see what cards I want to replace.
俺も意味が分からんかった
Damn that does look good. Maybe one day once this becomes a project car. That's the long term plan at least.
Went out with my brother and a couple of buddies. We pounded a bottle of 99(insert fruit) before going inside some club. My brother told me I tried to dance with the biggest girls I could find in the club. Like every single one I went up to was 300+ pounds. I ended up falling a sleep on the dance floor and the bouncers kicked me out. We took my car, but my brother was DD so he drove home. I was in the passenger seat and I rolled down my window to throw up while he's still driving. I woke up the next day to go to my car, about to yell at someone for throwing up in my car only find out that I was the one who did it.  I have a Vegas story that includes throwing up while getting a lap dance, a college story in which I shutdown an entire party. But this story here makes me cringe the most.
Life depends on the universe. The universe does not depend on life.  That's the simplest argument I can imagine.
Well meme'd, friend.
Rumor is San Diego.
First time Monster Hunter and Ukanlos was my first "oh shit"' run moment. To this day, I still don't know how to get away from him when he's in submerged mode and chasing me
I'm waiting for the Scylla Music to pop back up in the middle of the screen and start haunting us again...
[Nebris' POV](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tuCmUrARWaM) is here!
Online always, invasions are never a problem because they never happen 
Yeah, I heard the dogs become invincible when they sense you're mashing r1 like a scrub.
They were both in Batman Eternal, i dont think they interacted much but were in the same room.
You son of a b*tch
So who would be the leader of this team?  Stanya?  I could get behind promoting paladins for her.
OP delivers! 
Alex! I haven't seen you since we got back! What's up? *He says with a grin.* 
Heat sinks
So I guess you're just here with your throwaway to express your racial intolerance. Crime is not supported by me but I am capable of stepping outside myself for 5 seconds and understanding why. The success you may have built for yourself is not available to everyone. Many people escape the same as you from all communities. The hubris you employ to expect the same result at every turn is near bigotry. Your life is not the same as another's and your expectation that it is is exactly why people feel marginalized. Your more part of the problem than anything.
Abraham's quote was powerful but not the best in persuasion. I think Carol's dialogue before hand about the Alexandrian's being children and children liking stories put Maggie's speech ahead of the rest. 
How a wonderfully daft idea made Gary a millionaire 
1mbps up should be sufficient for 480p/800kbps video, 192kbps audio
Ok chill, I was just wondering because of all the hoopla about it
Can anyone explain why this comment was downvoted to oblivion? I'm new to this.
I scour the inside of the carboy with hot water, mild soap, and aquarium rocks.  Then I swirl the rocks around the inside of the bottle for a couple mins.  Then rinse and sterilize.  On average, 7 mins.
ey b0ss I wanna gold
A sad fact in our world is realpolitik is more important than democracy, especially in a region such as the Middle East where it's a free for all version of ["The Great Game"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Great_Game).  
Nice. If you don't want to order new trucks I would definitely look into getting new bushings for the trucks, as the current ones suck. 
Guess I'm watchin' this movie tonight.
That's pretty badass. ALL HAIL
\_o\_
That's the exact same laptop I used
&gt; Probably biracial  coming from /u/teenagewelfaremother
If you're gonna do it over again, you may as well do it over again and make the money so that your journey to 100% is well funded and enjoyable. 
If only you used it a steal some grammar
I agree. I don't see a single male model in this video.
If bears are available Id love to take it 
Only as weird as my eye that twitches when I hear the sound of nails on a chalkboard...
There *is* a way to emulate a GM and improvise story based on rolls and formal logic. It's called Mythic, and is available as a PDF.
Ahahaha, he regrets the greatest prank he ever pulled. That's like Seinfeld saying he wish he never did the airplane peanuts bit.
Mostly fake sweet food type of shit like "vanilla bean" or "fresh baked" cookies" or "pumpkin pie".
A+ response. As a smaller breasted woman, I'm definitely happy with what I got even though I've been shamed like this previously!
I loved 2014 Forest Hills Drive but it didn't even make my top 10 for last year. As far as rap goes Run The Jewels, Lecrae, The Roots, Big K.R.I.T. and YG had superior albums. It was still awesome and probably J.Cole's best thing since The Warm Up.  Hopefully that Cole/Kendrick album comes out this year
To get access to SOL you need rankings with federation. Killing wanted in RES does not rankings. It does however gives you reputation. Reputation != rankings.  High reputation makes you friendly / allied with the faction but does not count toward your rankings. Only way to progress rankings is to grind missions for said faction.  Being allied / friendly with a faction will however give you more missions availeable to do.   Hope any of that made sense. It is 3 in the morning and I should have gone to sleep some time ago. 
Champs sent me these Kobe 9 EMs which I already had.. I ordered another cw of Kobe 9s in store and had them delivered to my apartment because they didn't have my size and now Champs told me that I have to return them to the original store (I ordered them while traveling) to get a refund.   I now have 2 pairs of a mediocre Kobe 9 cw. FML.
As relaxing as this dogtv is can we get back to the msg channel?  EDIT: and as I say that it changes.  Coincidence?  I think not.
650w is more than enough for SLI.
not to hijack the threat. but anyone try pilates?
You guys knew that was coming huh? Pero was gonna pull the chair
Meanwhile, the UN makes no mention of and does not condemn the unprovoked attack on Yemen led by Saudi Arabia.
I honestly have no idea. I'm sure wiziwig or another streaming site would have them up somewhere. 
Which model of Oakleys are those?
As it shouldn't.  Who keeps the Black Spear? It's so damn useful for that W passive on your Soulbound's attacks.
Back in the days of t9 keyboards, I could touch type without even looking at the screen. I kinda miss that to be honest...
I hate three-day shifts. 
If I remember correctly, some people pointed out that ieatbugs posted mean things about people in pictures that were posted on that sub. That's why I think many people were upset, too -- it wasn't *just* all the shady stuff she did in r/SCA, but she was criticizing people with a similar body type to her own.
Steve Bono
Cool dilemma to have, at least i think so. I think we all game for different reasons but bottom line its the fun factor. Although this gen has taken some of that away with the console wars which is sad. Gaming is always going to better with friends no matter what console what gen what resolution. Go with them and have a good time..... 
I believe it's more about preventing abuse than it is not feeding people.
stub hub dude
https://twitter.com/graymartigan/status/583028307404288000  yes!
We seem to hit the post way more than I think would be statistically likely
can you pack another mixed beverage in a box on accident and then realize that you probably should at least make another beverage and go from there?
great! thanks for the knowledge share 😄
Yes, but the latest updates are always posted on the paradox forum first.  https://forum.paradoxplaza.com/forum/index.php?forums/meiou-and-taxes.839/
[Original post](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/30z8yu/)
Most of the subtitles were completely wrong translation 
Guess we found Shane McMahon's Reddit account.
As an American who likes to shoot guns, I agree. To a point. For me, I think hunting rifles and shotguns are fine, but no one here actually needs a Death Machine 50 cal kinda gun
I like the simplified SKU lineup. Still a shame some of the debugging stuff is locked behind the high-end SKU, but this is a much more reasonable feature breakdown compared to what existed previously.
You could load the game to RAM and get nearly instant load. 
Support this guys! 
You moderate a sub for rapists.
When I worked for the Port Authority we were trained how to use a fire extinguisher.  I don't see how the US Border Patrol should be any different.  
A LSx and 6 speed would get you decent efficiency without resorting to some dumb V6. 
I don't agree with threatening violence (which could just be one crazy dude or even an agent provocateur).  I'm merely applying the same principle.
Rush Limbaugh still hasn't moved to Costa Rica, either. 
nah this time EU is like "damn those NA guys they already stole bjergsen we must have incarnation"
Ok I gotta keep this chain going...you know Hellbenders right?
What on earth is happening to the comments in this thread?  edit: ahhh now i see!
did you try /reloadui? That fixed it for me.
Agh :( Crap. you have the 13" macbook pro. Yeah... that's a no-go for gaming, unfortunately. You need a 15" macbook pro with a second more powerful graphics card :/ 
I always get excited when I see a Vancouver reference out in the wild.  Edit: I guess this is more like a hockey reference.
GO JETS GO!
You're using statistics to understand social trends? How dreadfully uncreative. Are you sure you're not one of those godawful STEM majors?
This is a pretty bad post. 
Nope i didn't, in fact i had a pretty new computer, i had probably some kind of keylogger on my computer. I don't know how it happened but it was for sure my mistake, maybe i did clicked on some link or logged somewhere where i shouldn't,but i don't remember such thing, and after scanning i didn't found any malware, so i just reinstalled my windows twice just to be sure :) (some keyloggers or programs like that may stay after windows reinstall). Biggest mistake is that i had unsecured e-mail account. Right now it doesn't matter, i just want to get back my account and i got enough proofs that it's mine.
Oh, I'm talking about sticking 5-8 adepts inside a building 3rd nexus.
Shut your dirty mouth 
That URL.
Won mine in a raffle. 
The difference is that Braben didn't think he was an immortal god. Garriott made the mistake of thinking he was safe and having a massive crowd around him in a game where PVPing was huge. One nuke spell later and he was dead. Fucking hilarious.
I tried kill, but very low droprate, many attemps and got 0. With capture it works better, but if you do this with a group they may say capture is bad, they're never happy -_-
I had a vague idea about our minds being in computers but not the specifics and I knew about the slowing time. Also I have never watched Keanu Reaves in anything before and his performance really took me out of the film at times. 
I would've known this answer whether or not I watched Archer.  But that episode popped into my head and I knew the answer that much faster.
Oh, fair enough.
Trade for blue JFK tee and pink heather living tee both large?
FYI if you download the Comedy Central app and put in your network provider and email info (Twitter &amp; Facebook are options), you can stream it right now. I'm in the US and use xfinity which is probably a lot of you guys as well. 
The animation could all be handled by one company adapting them into a style similar to the manga.  But knowing that they have a lot of hands in the pot, why not just do it under a joint Disney and SE ownership like how Sony and Disney are working together to let Spider-Man into the Avengers?  Just seems like a missed opportunity to me.  :/  And... I don't want to play the games, but have been so invested in them it's like a drug.  It has gotten so convoluted that I think only making a show could sort it out.
No thanks
The symbols look faded, i thought so. :l
Am I the only one annoyed that some of the letters extend beyond the pink background?
In some of those awful forums I do spend a lot of time helping folks out, too.  Appreciate the support.  And I appreciate all opinions, even haters.  Heck, I took the advice of haters.
I'm not sure about that specific car but yeah our 2003 tdi gets around 55mpg closer to 60 if you feather it everywhere 
It's just a running joke at this point
I hear you. Carlisle has been around forever as well. I would imagine Cambro is probably cheaper at a supply house than on Amazon.
His height on Google is given as 1.75m, which puts him at 5.7 feet (and not 5'7 - doh). 
Nomadic Chronicle
sick nasty amv dude
It was the only car not driven by an idiot so it had that going for it.
I do have a shiny charm and a foreign competitive ditto, I have 10 more eggs to check 
bradlatta 31 lock
Voting doesn't matter.
WHATS IN THE BOX?!
So you've beat it then?
Duncan
&gt; but they lack the ability to have an epic story because they focus on being realistic and human.  What? Since when is that an issue? Have you even played Uncharted 2? The story in that was beyond epic. It sounds like *you* just want Sony to make something sci-fi/fantasy.
A bunch of these sprung up recently outside of my office...I love them so much and am so happy Spring and color are returning! Sadly the purple reminds me of my ex so that is the only down side. :(
I don't use micro, but I do have a pocketderm prescription.  I didn't have any flaking at all, and I think a lot of people could avoid it if they started slower and tried to avoid dehydration instead of just "pushing through it."  I started with every third day and it was a few months before I started using it every day (I increased to every day about a month in I think, but my face started feeling dry so I cut back again), and in the meantime I made my routine as hydrating as I could (I'm still in the process of doing that but so far I've added a hydrating toner and an AM moisturizer).
You sound just like a conspiracy theorist.  I hope you are happy. 
Sadly my students are a little too old for this to work, I think, but thank you for the suggestion. I'll save it for next year, when I work with some younger kids.
oooof
Circlejerks like these are more negatively affecting the sub than any particular widely-held agreement about a particular series 'affects' it (since convos here I doubt really have any 'effect' on shows produced in Japan).  I mean, I think circlejerk is just universally used as a slightly vulgar (woah edgy) term for 'I disagree with and feel like a minority in that regard'. So basically, 'what do you like or dislike that most folks on the sub would disagree with?'   I'm all for argument and debate about the merits of a show, but threads like this that seem to just be salves for the egos of folks who feel persecuted for disagreeing are a little embarrassing. They further the whole superiority complex thing rather than encouraging folks to admit that we disagree but it doesn't necessarily mean everyone else's taste is utter shit.  My argument will be slightly undercut if this post gets a lot of upvotes, since it'd hardly be a circlejerk if folks agreed with my criticism. 
Ezreal Q procs lifesteal, on-hit items and the like. This is why Trinity/Gauntlet is a core piece for AD Ezreal.  For all intents and purposes, Ezreal Q is an auto attack.  It's an ability, yes, but it's not a *spell*. Luden's only procs on *spells*. Thus his W, E and R all can proc it.  This same is true for every other spell item. Rylai's, Spell Vamp, Liandry's.. They don't work on his Q.
I don't think we should combine the two Yoshi stages since they're both competitively viable and very different stages, it'd probably be confusing for anyone who uses both stages in tourny. Everything else would be great.
Not the worst I've seen. These were less than 24 hours apart.  On the same blog.  By the same guy.  http://i.imgur.com/EXdVMHi.jpg
Paul Kariya surfing down at San Onofre.   Teemu at his restaurant.   Brian Heyward at a regular public skate session. 
Yes he hung himself. 
Sent! Nice, I will check it out!
haha i have an apple store a few blocks away from my office so you've got a deal!
Try gorilla grip. :)
I heard he's like an extra linebacker
Stack donation missions?!? How much do you think i want to give away?!? :D
silent killer would be 4 points for secondary weapons and 12 for primary+secondary, and you lose the base 30% that currently exists so a silenced 40 damage weapon with good secondary stats is unlikely if not impossible. The way I think about it is an alternative to berserker, you have worse weapon until it is activated and then you have a weapon that is ~45% better until you lose the streak, berserker on deathwish is 60% so its about the same as that is currently.  I dont think silenced weapons will go well with crit builds because silencers generally have an inverse relationship with concealment and damage, higher concealment means less damage. They also don't have much for acc/stab so you have to find that somewhere else in other mods and probably will end up sacrificing additional concealment there. multiply the problem by 2 if you want both your primary and secondary to benefit. That said I haven't looked at any specific weapon builds with silencers, its just my intuition telling me it wouldn't be very good.  For SMGs I think the problem is fixed by assault rifles still being better versions of SMGs, you would need to reach the 35 damage breakpoint with an SMG for it to get 40 damage with the skill plus the 5% from a deck, they still mostly have smaller magazines, lower pickup rates and tighter mod requirements compared to assault rifles.
Also posted this on /r/LogitechG, painting/plastidip, swapping or putting a filter on the window will break the warranty.
Whether it was perpetrated by Chinese hackers hired by NK, orchestrated by Sony, or was just an inside revenge job, Sony rode the hype train to push "The Interview",then switched back to Zero Fucks mode once it was released. 
because you like me
But 0.4208147317 is one.  I tried to write 420 BLAZEIT
Off topic but if you do end up talking to him, fin sour his speed and incline and time for me. Just started getting into treadmill running and o wanna push myself. Thanks 
I honestly didn't see that.  I know her, so it wouldn't surprise me at all that she would wear white and not wear a bra at all.
The only thing scary about The Babadook is the kid's behavior. 
So the worst thing about all of this is -- you're obviously very, very good, but because these guys were such dicks, you decided it wasn't a place you wanted to be and left. Thankfully those dicks left and you came back, but I feel like there are so many similar situations in which a woman proves her worth in a group of guys (in sports, video games, science, whatever), but is still unwelcome so leaves, and then the guys use this as "evidence" that she "couldn't cut it" and that girls just aren't as good at fill-in-boy's-club-activity here. And then the cycle begins again. 
This looks like a job for someone smarter than me to figure out...
/r/PokePorn   Haha, how can you hate me?
Beeehiiind
BS of Accounting, BS of Economics here. Most my classes were teaching it simultaneously. 
I don't understand why Karma didn't push for a team change if he is unhappy with his team's situation. He said he doesn't want to play 2ks/5ks with them.
bruh 
WAIT ISN'T YOUR GIRLFRIEND CANADIAN? 
What was the quality of the weed before the additives were stuck on?
I suppose he's just trying to fit in with his surroundings, since everyone else has some non-American accent, he can't just use his American one as it would sound even weirder
I think this might be calcite. I can sort of make out what looks like calcite like cleavage. Calcite can fluoresce multiple colors under UV light depending on wavelength if I recall.  
Yes indeed "for science"
Isn't  burlesque just code for obese woman not quite stripping, and claiming it's an empowering feminist act? 
Even in context I first understood it as smoking haha.  Granted I do toke and don't skate.  Got to the end and was like "oh yeah, skating."
It kind of is though. If these videos are a sandwich its a serious question with two slices of banter on either side. It allows them to actually discuss topics without being quoted as THIS JUST IN, CHAMBERS DOESN'T FEEL COMFORTABLE IN HIS RIGHT BACK POSITION.   You actually learn a lot more from these types of videos than the stupid scripted interviews that they are made do.
I pledge my never ending loyalty.......
The culture in my area considers this a compliment. I'm okay with it because I've grown up with it, I don't participate in it but I know so many ladies who call pregnant women mama as soon as they're showing. Lots of men do too but it doesn't bother me. But there are lots of other cultural things that I'm totally not cool with that many other bumpers are cool with.
Title|Points|Subreddit|Submitted -|-:|-|- \[Image\] Just wanted to show someone my belt I bought at Christmas...Hole #4 today!|3557|/r/GetMotivated|5 hours ago Belt foot|1|/r/SneakyBackgroundFeet|3 hours ago
Permanent Midnight
I go to about as many Cardinals games as Cubs games (wife and family are Cardinals fans and we live in Champaign) so I'm at Busch 5-6 times a summer. When I'm at Wrigley I have to admit I've caught myself a few times looking up for a screen to watch a replay on a great play or something that I missed. 
Amazing just like all your music. Can I get an MP3 version? With smaller file size to put on my iPod?
東電や政府はもちろんまじめに取り組む気も解決する気もありません
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anecdotal_evidence
Great post, I have one question though...  How is Batman vs Superman?
Do you mean to tell me the band lied when they said Columbus, Ohio really rocks the hardest? :(((
the lord of android, and what /r/androidcirclejerk (obviously anti-apple) praises
Conservatives like to cut taxes. Liberals like to spend money. All of them want to get re-elected. The populous wants the government to cut spending, but not on ANYTHING they actually use.
reading this thread again I do have to add, Marchand is a bigger diver then Crosby for sure, for some reason got your comment mixed with another and I thought you were insulting Bergeron (my lord and savior)
Harassment is a crime or set of crimes in it's self. Saying speech laws stop harassment is giving them a big upgrade. And minorities can be wrong about things. If you want the law to hector bigots for their beliefs, we'll all be getting a visit from the police.
Was this from scratch or did you trace before painting it? 
[Oh god...](http://i.imgur.com/7drHiqr.gif) 
Axe from dota 2.
leafs up 2-0, carolina down 2-0..
Starving Kids in Africa could have eaten that keyboard you monster.
What eventually happens to [Aliens](http://www.mountainproject.com/images/64/76/107586476_large_80eb2d.jpg) on granite. The soft metal does bite, but also wears quicker.
Which is why he said "the odds are really good" not "this is 100% certain."  Did you even read the comment you responded to?
I don't know a lot about sewing machines but one thing I have seen repeated quite often is the size of the motor.  Most good machines have the motor separate mounted under the table.  This one has it inside the case I assume so the motor is smallish.  Here is a good video by Arthur Porter on selecting a leather sewing machine [video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iYo2ST0m7f8)
If she catches him alone, something that's looking more and more likely now his team of misfits are dying off, she should be okay. She has people around her.
The steel foundry/forging plant I work in sends all of the scale from the steel ingots to the landfill. They have tried for years to find something else to do with it but always end up sending it to the landfill. 
Mirillis Action! On sale right now for 19.99
Let the power of German engineering heal you!
&gt;Hey guysh thish is Krish form Haylow Follower and I have a surprising theory that will blow your minds...
Hi.  To answer your initial question, I don't really see much at fault with your resume here.  I wonder how active your job search is?  I think a lot of people hit apply via a job board and call it a day.  If that's not working then you need to do something else, and honestly that something else is networking.  You need to meet people, you need to attend professional events, you need to let everyone know that you're searching, and not just the recruiters.  Recruiters are fine, and don't give up on them just yet, check in at least once a month so that your name is on the tip of their tongue when they check in with the companies they work for, but always remember that a recruiter is not there to help you, they are essentially agents of the company and must be even more restrictive gate keepers than someone who works in the organization.   What you need a this point is direct contact with a decision maker in any way that you can get it, conferences, linkedin groups, certification courses, professional associations, alumni associations from your school- anything that puts you in front of actual people is your friend.  Austin having a big IT market isn't necessarily to your advantage, bc that to me sounds like it's a buyers market.  They can be as picky and peculiar as they want to be if there aren't a dearth of professionals.  Lastly I always say think creatively about your search, maybe it's tough to find these proj. mgmt positions in larger well established private businesses, but easier to find them in schools, or non-profits, or media outlets. It's good to ask yourself what are the other places that might need this function that I do?  What are some of the places that are *going* to need this function that I do and don't even realize it? Identifying those opportunities can put you ahead of the pack instead of playing catch up by applying to what you see online. ETA:  I can't claim any expertise in IT so obviously take this with a grain of salt, the tl;dr of this is don't just apply online, network and communicate and get in front of a real decision maker as soon as you can
What's wrong with using the specs to do some independent math?
So they can make a living and produce the food for the rest of us, or something like that 
Glad someone else has some sense. Plus this truck actually looks like it could tow 5th wheel trailer 
Thanks. I definitely get 'stupider' the more technical the work. And some of my work gets quite analytical. I go to people who are more junior than me and I ask them to check my work because they seem so confident. And then sometimes they talk down to me and it's like... I feel angry but I deserve it because I taught them to do that. I shouldn't be angry with them just because they are lucky enough to be confident and clever. 
Help, my reddit is in spanish!
It is very unfair. What I understand is that the Future Shop pay system or benefits are completely different from Best Buy so they let everybody go. I hope they at least got severance pay, this is a terrible time to lose a job.  
Buying useless crap to show off my nerdiness.
With Marc and the grizzlies sliding out of the 2nd seed. I can see first team going to dj. Djs putting up pretty historic numbers 
Soon it'll be tight enough to hang yourself.
people keep making these comments but after watching BOTH films I had people asking questions afterwords because they didn't understand it. Maybe he made Interstellar more heavy handed with the exposition because of the massive complaints that Inception was too complex and confusing.
Congratulations! 
Good people can disagree and have a rational discussion about it. Bullies call them names and shout them down based on your obsession with it.    Just look at this thread. It's pure mob mentality.   It is quite an insult to many blacks who went thru civil rights movement with redefining marriage of your choosing to a group of people who are better off them most other groups.   There is no difference in a persons skin color. there is a huge difference between the sexes. It's silly to compare them.
"Workshop! The arcade is for loafers." 
Open bar, have many copies of Drunk Quest, ????, profit 
Everyone's already infected.  I believe the bite causes the fever and the turn comes when you die . Bodily fluids transmission from the comic never made sense. 
I think they could be tiger roars. Though I could be wrong; there are Asiatic lions, but in India I was under the impression that tigers are more prevalent. Though after some skimming, the sound director could be making an allusion to the Hindu god Narasimha who is a half man half lion, or an allusion to Shiva who is often depicted wearing or sitting on tiger skins. Though Shiva's association with tigers is more spiritual in nature. I will need to watch this movie to be sure! =)  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Narasimha  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shiva  On a completely related note, yeah those were pretty freaking sweet.
I just hope they don't spoil any of the good parts in the movie and just hint us at what might happen.
I'll take your word for it, especially with that username.   Any recommendations on what to look out for when it comes to picking a quality salami, btw? This thread's given me some serious cured meat hunger.
Assuming I were torrenting?
slightly puncturing the gut surface to allow internal moisture to escape.
"Not since we went skating."
Wow, I knew it was a tiny chance, but that last one... Could you perhaps relate that to the size of Texas or Wales. I can work with either standard system.
Wtf is a circle jerk fan base lol
I can't really understand what you're saying. 
I think OP was implying that he did unsub from it by these words:   &gt; I've been much happier on reddit without it.  English is super easy to understand.
Good job man.   It doesn't mean you weren't managing your Magnetite by being conservative with it.
Just invited you 
I am a Blue fan but State always had prettier girls...GO BLUE!
Makes sense actually, thanks for that.
Yeah, but then you get the downvote-y hall monitors who want to start waving around the "rule violation" card and downvote the hell out of those posts.
Nice!
Good
still closer than i have been to getting pitted
Carolina Sporting Arms on South Boulevard and Firepower, Inc. in Matthews have been good stores and are decent ranges.  Avoid Hyatts, "largest gun store in America", their prices are higher than average and their staff is lackluster. 
You should take the least amount you can to get the minimum effect you need. There's really no reason to take more than 100 mg. The absorption doesn't matter. Dosing takes the bioavailability into account.
So is he becoming a CSI or is this an english test?
Eat bacon. Lots and lots of bacon. And guzzle it down with the strongest beer you can find. You should be fine the next day.
It's this Monday coming - the 6th.  This week was the Macho Man DVD playing after....
http://www.buddhanet.net/e-learning/history/b_faqs.htm  Buddhanet disagrees with you. They say they do not pray but have meditations that could be compared to prayer.  Prayer is not a hope and a wish. If it was I imagine the line "A hope and a prayer" would be a little redundant don't ya think?
Carefresh is notoriously dusty in my experience. If you can, I would switch back to aspen or if you like the softness of carefresh, perhaps try kaytee clean n' cozy. It is much less dusty. Even my allergy ridden rat does decently with it, but with carefresh he sneezes constantly. Do you remember if the sneezing started when you switched beddings? Maybe it is just allergies.   It may help to switch to a bin cage so you can put some ventilation holes on the sides as well as the top, so there is some additional ventilation, but a 20 gallon should be fine if you and your SO don't want to switch. I would clean it more often though. Many people spot clean every 2 days (take out visibly soiled litter and replace that with new stuff) and then do a full clean every day or so.   A vet tech program may be a good option if you guys can't find any vets to take a look at him. Most vet programs at colleges love the students to have broad experiences, so some will look at the hamster for free and listen to the lungs for you. If you live in Illinois, I'll do it for you if you want.   
TEEMO, WHY THE HELL DO YOU HAVE ARMOR PEN?!?!  *puts down a line of shrooms, proceeds to get full health from lifesteal when they explode*
I just said I only flame on reddit and such, because I get a gig out of it.
As a counter argument though, doesn't "everyone" in the Xbox audience have Xbox Live, since it's required for their multiplayer too? And iirc, XBL Gold members just got AC:BF and Tomb Raider and BS:I and Rayman Legends and GoW: Judgment. AND they get to keep them even when their subscription expires. Sure, PS+ had some of these games in the past, but what happened to those great deals we used to have? I only got PS+ when I bought my PS4 in November and I feel kinda gypped on the types of games we're being given now. Keep in mind, I'm glad that Dishonored is being given this month, and I had a lot of fun with Injustice and New n Tasty, I just wish there were less indie games and more big AAA games that I've at least heard of.  Edit: Killzone is a good game for Vita this month too, I just don't own one. This just isn't a spectacular month for PS4 players, that's all.
It's not so much the name...as the association.
Well I'm on NG+ now. I couldn't find her after I beat all the bosses. I was able to find her on NG+ though
If I don't get my arcana flair now I might never get one but I don't want to lose muh empire flair the decisions :/
I wouldn't make one at all.  Most people that game tend to be tight with money.  Open a gaming store with snacks and a drink machine, if you really want to get into having gamers.  Adults drinking, eating, and playing games is really hard to get right.  It's an industry that doesn't already have franchises for a reason even though board games, booze, and bars have been around for decades.  Some niche place might be able to keep it profitable, but it's not a good idea overall.  Always remember at the end of the day it's a business.  
If you get a a chance to see this band live...go. No exceptions. Watching the drummer is worth the ticket price alone.
Also I'm only perpetuating what a court of law already decided ha... 
That'll *never* backfire in his school years! Ever! /s
I would have agreed with this, but I feel like this was the beginning of the Ambrose push. 
Oh, the thing that flies away to the right? Holy crap.
Do I know you?
It has pics, and original draftsman images of early designs.
&gt; a) I don't consider arguments, I do but most of yours are stupid or clear Riot PR. Burden of knowledge is not an argument and neither are most of yours.  you want to tell me that the article contains some new informations and isnt just the NDA-article with some new quotes and a title that is more a clickbait?  I mean all new he found out is that Riot supports an external online community by having someone administrate the mods IRC channels and sending out teemo hats...  but hey lets make a big deal out of this, because someone would totally go corrupt for  a cheap ass goodie.  &gt; b) It's on nearly the same level as censorship. Because one is denying people information and the other is not listening to arguments over the internet.   i would agree with you if the other article and the NDA itself wasnt already posted. So no information denied. 
There's an old book called [Shaving Made Easy](https://archive.org/details/shavingmadeeasyw0020th) in which the author says (chapter XI) that an oily and limp whisker is more likely to bend and the razor will cut the whisker at an angle and put strain on the roots.  He suggests against hot water and to use a soap that will remove the oils, consequently making the whisker stiff and easier to cut.  Nowadays we opt to use cool or cold water to achieve this effect.  It's also worth noting that the same book says that a straight razor's edge has teeth like a saw under a microscope which we know to be false within any reasonable amount of magnification.
Seriously.  A week ago, Roman had X-Pac heat.  Now, he's over like 1-2-3 Kid.  
A sudden inability to maintain an erection, in your 20s, is a symptom of a SEVERE threat to your cardiovascular health. Consult a doctor immediately
Please provide some support for your wild assertion that "unsecured cargo" frequently kills people. I work in logistics and, while injuries/death do sometimes result from the transportation of goods, I have never heard of a case like this. 
I like it a lot but it took a while to set it's tone, it evolves into a darker dramedy after the first season.
The anguished cries of a family as a child's mother and a husband's wife's has her head caved in by a brick flying through the windshield.  There are no words in the English language to describe the depth of the sorrow, the anguish, the pain, that you hear in those voices, those screams.   I don't like thinking about it because it makes me cry and sours my stomach.
Okay, I've just taken a position writing code for the operations department at an industrial facility. I've inherited a lot of ASP Classic spaghetti code of mixed VBScript and HTML. I don't have access to the web server operating system, just the virtual root for the website. Most of our webpages are makeshift applications for displaying information about equipment and work orders contained in an oracle database.  I want to work some clojure/clojurescript into the server. How can I do this?
Law enforcement I can see somewhat. Military (which he is....) I don't. Especially for fellow American citizens.
Deleted the cache, 1 client updated again, the other one not. The updating client started, after that, the other one did its job as well. I relocated the Sharde Cache Folder, somehow the Launcher was not able to do anything in the default one. 
I prefer founder and speaker
If it was a civil suit that was dismissed then the whole situation is over and done with besides lodging a complaint.
tfw can't kill sefl cuz jus go a lil hullow
Other people enjoy recalling these moments. Obviously the majority of /r/futurama subscribers. It's kinda how tv subreddits go.   Check out /r/thesimpsons.
It would still fall at the same rate, mythbusters did a thing on it where they dropped a bowling ball and fired a gun from the same height, both hit the ground at the same time. 
Thanks! :)
For servers- it's worth looking into used/off-lease merchandise. You can get some pretty souped up systems at a reasonable price. I bought my last server from [Insight Systems Exchange](https://www.insightsystemsonline.com/products/) and I have zero regrets. It is plenty fast for my small school, and it has RAID/Redundant Power Supplies, etc. I feel a lot better getting a name brand server (HP Proliant) instead of a generic box.
Why does my girlfriend think it's perfectly acceptable to fart around me and find it hilarious, but when I do it she acts like I just murdered her dog?
I LIVEEEEEEEE
Hell yeah he is!
I read every line of the article looking for the "OH! *That's* why they really did it." No dice.  Who needs Sharia Law?
Thanks for that tale, I will definitely be going out for a long term trek once I get more Cr saved up ;)
I was freakin' raised by the edge chronicles. I love it. Also hailing from Tacoma area!
What's the past connection with c9?
I'm going to be so salty if this was april fools.
I'm all for putting drug dealing murderers in jail, but... One has to question the culpability of someone convicted under these circumstances.  I lean towards the notion that Ulbricht is guilty.  However, this warrants a comprehensive review by the Courts, possibly a retrial, and possibly a release if more shenanigans are discovered.  How much of the evidence could have been fostered?  It's a big deal to lock somebody up.  We should err heavily on the side of innocence.  A rogue agent carries a lot of implications.
It sounds like I need the i5 then. It won't be anything super intense. 
And BAM! You're now single, congrats.
duude that would be a bitch to deal with  I like it
[Ahem](http://img.pandawhale.com/82671-Ill-allow-it-Senor-Chang-commu-fErc.gif)
I don't know what universe you've been in but now your here. Look up at the night sky my friend. The stars are beautiful are they not? But you wouldn't be able to see these stars shine if not for the contrast of the infinite darkness that surrounds them. You sound like a star like me. We can't take away the darkness that surrounds us my friend but we can shine for all else to see. So shine bright, it will be tough but remember that the kinder, nicer you are to others "even if they don't deserve it" the more you shine and stand out as one who wasn't takin by the darkness.
The majority of the poor are poor because they grew up in a poor environment.  Saving money is a learned behaviour not a genetically coded trait.  Assuming a Universal Parenting Machine existed, the deviation in motivation and decision making ability currently seen in the population would narrow *considerably.*. That's why being poor is inherited and why we still see measures of socioeconomic status correlated to unrelated things, like race.  Capitalism is inherently unequal and being poor is a relative measure.  Obviously you can't eliminate one without the other.
Wait if you dont have a WiiU then why the hell are you even here complaining about something that doesn't affect you!?
And them's the facts.
Are you unsure of this hobby? 
Hi there! It looks like you're trying to submit to a video hosting site or blog. Please know that we only allow links to Imgur albums due to receiving too much blogspam/YouTube spam.   If you're trying to submit something to your blog, please see [reddit's spam rules here](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/faq#wiki_what_constitutes_spam.3F), and if you fall into that category, please go somewhere else.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FDIY) if you have any questions or concerns.*
༼∩ຈل͜ຈ༽⊃━☆ﾟ. * ･ ｡ﾟ *speedforce*
Yes, Desmond is dead. Plus, I can't see Ubisoft ever bringing him back, seeing as AC4:BF was clearly wrapping up his story, and transitioned us from a modern day story to a whatever the hell AC:U's modern day arc was.   Point is, Desmond's done for.
I thought I was estimating up for tax + shipping. [Guess not.](http://www.pennyskateboardsonline.com/shop/by-size/penny-original-22.html) Starts at $100 from official sellers, only goes up from there. 120 for fancier pours, and griptape is still extra. 
&gt;He's soft (he can't take nor does he tell crass jokes),  So are many great comedians, Jerry Seinfeld for example.   A roast and a shitty movie are not good indicators of his comedy. Try watching one of his specials. Then again, maybe hes just not for you. Comedy is subjective.  
[Original post](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/30za60/)
That's super sweet! It's really nice when someone notices your style, especially if it's something you're very quietly proud of and put thought into.
How would you be displaced if you already own it?
Last I checked OP was denying access and the sheriff was involved.  I am assuming the next step was litigation.
I've never tried a MAC Retromatte, so not sure how they compare, but Australis "Diva" is the same shade as Ruby Woo, and may be a nicer formula? I have it, and it's pretty drying, but again, no idea how it compares to the MAC one :)
I know I wasn't the only awkward 7 year old that used to get Dr. Quinn, Medicine Woman boners.  I'm sure my parents found it weird that I watched that show each week.
soo sexy
see this /u/rhysium can i try it on you?
I hate her guts when she comes out.  That's when I realize it's working.
100%, and I would never claim to have even a vague idea of how to solve any of it. And as with anything in this city, no matter what you do you are going to be upsetting a lot of people. I do not envy those decision makers.
More like, i think, Kronner
So pretty :3
This x1000.  Both sides of the debate are loathe to admit there could possibly be any losers in this issue.  What your wife said is, I think, going to be the biggest negative impact: when employers have to pay more, they will want more.  And its so very easy to simply apply a more rigorous standard to the next pile of resumes.  Yup, look for unemployment among the unskilled to rise and rise - especially in the Pierce county area where there are not as many opportunities as in Seattle.
I wish i didn't watch that.  Reddit needs some NSFL tags.
Needing one to complete my build, awesome giveaway
I've done a lot of console rpg's (fallout, elder scrolls, dark souls, divinity, and bioshock), what kind of dichotomy should I be expecting?
She was a great guest indeed. A lot of the guest get intimated by TB verbosity and tend to stay quit due to it but she had no issues at all jumping in the discussions with usually an interesting point/view to add.
T W I T C H B O Y S
Stay strong. I'm 19 and been smoking for like 2 years. I can go periods of time without smoking but every so often I get the craving and smoke a few times for a few weeks then I stop for few weeks to months. I don't want to keep going but its becoming harder. It seems as if mine is a mix of boredom and no money for weed. 
The outcome of this roll should determine some of the results of this post. [Read more here](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldpowers/wiki/codeofethics#wiki_.5Bevent.5D).  [[1d20]] +/u/rollme   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fworldpowers) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What is this?
&gt;Xavier comes from the name of the Catholic Saint Francis Xavier, where Xavier stands for the saint's birthplace, the town of Javier (Xabier in Basque; Xavier in Old Spanish) in Navarre, Spain  Nope, Spain.  I could have just picked a bad example of a non-white name, I don't know.
Underdog for Natty if they can recruit well. Georgia Southern
Europe checking in. Actually it's VERY prevalent here.
I told a homeless guy I'll give him 5 bucks if he gets me change for a $20, he disappeared with the 20. I used to give money to homeless often until I had conversations with a couple of them.
..when they are ready.   There is simply a lot of work to do, they prioritize the best they can and I think most people would agree there are quite a few more important things right now than character customization. If things go well then we might see stuff like character creation near the end of the year when the PU alpha comes online, maybe even earlier with the social module if we are lucky.   As for alien races they are much farther away and we won't be playing as them anytime soon. Playable alien races isn't even a feature planned for launch, it will come well after the game releases. While we will be seeing a lot of Vanduul since they are essentially the 'enemy' race (and are hence the closest to completion) the other races will have a somewhat limited role at launch. 
Everyone needs to shut up about the video of the brick killing the wife in the passenger seat. Curiosity gets the best of so many- don't plant that seed. I'm serious, that video scarred me horribly; nobody would go back and watch it over again if given the choice.
There are no penalties.
Great timing.
FYI : "**The sale of poppers in any formulation has been banned in Canada**. Although not considered a narcotic and not illegal to possess or use, they are considered a drug. Sales that are not authorized can now be punished with fines and prison"....also "Common side effects of popper use include headaches and temporary erectile problems. Other risks include burns if spilled on skin. Adverse effects on the retina are a recently described issue following inhalation of poppers. "   http://dailyxtra.com/canada/news/health-canada-cracks-poppers-62971 https://urresearch.rochester.edu/institutionalPublicationPublicView.action?institutionalItemId=967&amp;versionNumber=1 http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC3496104/   **TL;DR ...Find some other(safer!) way to loosen your inhibition and use lots of lube ...If your female maybe use a Dilator(?)  Also Try R/Sex for advice**
It feels wrong, but so very right. So what makes your show worth watching?
&gt; First boot of a custom PC with an AMD GPU
Added
I'm definitely interested 
Thanks a lot :)
...or when Valve teased "[Jarate](http://www.teamfortress.com/post.php?id=2391)" for TF2 and everyone thought that was a joke. Two months later we were all throwing jars of piss at each other. 
Anyone know if there is an API or some way to get fetch data from the AFL site? If so, in theory you could write a macro to request updated data on scores and attendance figures etc.
Is that USD or AUD?
"A-ah! N-no!"
http://steelseries.com/products/keyboards/steelseries-6gv2 will not break. Seriously even the page says so and they aren't lying. No bullshit pretty much bare minimum and I really like it.
Here's mine, with a few Ws IP:  http://i.imgur.com/g2H1kPW.jpg
Threesome then? Heh
&gt; 4.) It is quite possible that just genetically we aren't as good at video games for whatever. While not likely, there are the comparisons of why Europeans struggle in basketball compared to Americans.  This is mainly because basketball isn't a very popular sport in Europe though, that has nothing to do with genetics  Same with football ("soccer" for you). It's not surprising that Americans are far better at basketball while Europeans are far better at football. The talent pool is just much much bigger in one region. And basketball isn't even the most extreme example, stuff like american football is basically non-existant in Europe   The talent pool for league is also bigger in EU than it is in NA but there's more money in NA. That naturally leads to one region importing players from other regions.   Messi isn't playing in Argentina either.
Thank you :) Yes, Eating disorders are serious. I've suffered on and off 11 years and I _just_ was told that starving and malnourishment like that can actually shrink the size of your heart...So I'm suitably scared
I feel like this'll be a test to see if he can do snarky and witty. If he can do it well, the producers will probably make the show closer to the comics in tone. If not, then they might keep the serious tone.
That's some heavy shit
It would be really cool if it went to stillwater and tulsa as well.
/u/linksfan can you sell me some Coal or Charcoal for the furnaces?
What about Goldeneye: Source? Remaking the classic N64 game, Goldeneye. Just like this tech demo thing, remaking a classic N64 level, this was never going to be a full game. I'm glad I played it while I could.
I'm with you, no idea why anyone would watch this.
he sort of does I think I'm pretty sure his roar is actually someone saying "Lizardon" except distorted
Adams seems like a perfect platoon candidate until you see Reynolds' recent numbers against lefties. He sucks too.
I always get a kick out of great authors disliking other great authors. Saving this link to read later. Thanks! 
[Kick doors you said?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fWH-RVM8hnU)
;w; I restarted my game a couple weeks back and I'm still poor. I will love you forever if you can fund my bridge!! In return take any perfect cherries lying around~ even tho ya so rich...
HMC which is a very similar concept with similar bandwidth and memory size limitations. HPC applications are most certainly using it. Xeon Phi Knights Landing is a perfect example. HPC APU's will aswell.
That is a pretty big leap you just made there from me saying I would like Chick-fil-a to serve breakfast all day to me hating gay people.
How about soy? It's possible they replaced the flour ingredient in it with something else you're allergic to and labeled it "gluten free" by eliminating the flour. These are largely flour, salt, etc., which you can see here: http://www.marthastewart.com/265236/making-play-dough-with-kids
OK COOL JUST WONDERING
Dad is a partner at P&amp;P, he helped pay for it.
If you go and there's no class, you now have a nice quiet room to do whatever in.
The stories are the same but the anime rearranged the episodes. 
League of Legends
It's not nice. The money that he was awarded comes from the taxpayers. Any money awarded from a lawsuit against municipalities should be donated to a local charity.
&gt; I don't get all the hate it gets from some corners.   Sadly, it is probably just from people "not getting it" in the sense that it *knows* that it is being absurd in all circumstances. But there really is no denying how fun it tries to make everything whenever it can.  &gt; Without a doubt this is the most underrated anime of 2015...  But there's so much left of 2015! And besides, that title may just go to Yuri Kuma Arashi. ;)
I'll PM you
Be hard to make it worse
What the fuck is happening? 
/r/crappydesign might enjoy this.
Thanks hilarious... they seriously say this? Wow knew fundamentalist were out there but that's a ten+ on the stupid thing to say list.
I used to be very shy as well, then I realized I was just hot.
/r/fuckchuck
inb4 "yeah but you're probably lying"
Yes. Much complaints. So sad my internet points are gone. 
Coo PM the link when you're all setup
When will I have time to go downstairs and get the doritos and pop tarts?
&gt; I don't say anywhere that I want to stop saving today.  Nope, it doesn't. But you used present tense in your post, so I thought it was a reasonable assumption.  Anyway, good work on the high levels of saving. If you can keep it up, you'll be fine no matter how you ultimately decide to approach your investing and retirement accounts.
I do that, until they're soft enough for me to eat. But just the taste of it makes me throw up.
&gt; weekend warriors  so people who work during the weekdays cant go hiking on the weekends?
You misread my point. I meant to say that there are 1000’s of civilisations, naming merely one where the opposite was true(for only a small portion of the high society mind you) is not a really good argument. By that logic all men aren't hard-wired to be more dominant because there is this one native Australian tribe where the woman are the dominant...
Yeah I would think that would be the only thing you can do without a IR blaster
The dungeon entrance meta is changing at an alarming rate.
I don't get why the Nets have the reputation of being a boring team, I love the old school style and feel in the arena.
Glad I could help, post a build thread when you make your move.  Love to see the finish. By the way sorry the bullets didn't work for half of the description. I don't know what went wrong. 
I saw Tropicalia and Athena at Rocky's on Briarcliff. Transmigration of Souls too.
Industrial mechanics are in super high demand, same for diesel and heavy machinery. I know I get $1000 just for finding one and they get $2000 for joining our company. The pay is good too if you find a good union company. Dirty work and it's hard, but also fun and rewarding.
Already done so [right here](http://www.reddit.com/r/Economics/comments/30wzvx/deconstructing_shadowstats_why_is_it_so_loved_by/cpx3fhf).
the 275 word limit, a blessing and a curse!   I wonder though how far is too far for a story on this sub, like what's the most graphic story ever posted on here.
Lol wut? I'm curious what your post said pre-edit. Did you actually have a rebuttal before? 
Does your resume say Seattle as your location?  They might consider your good but not good enough to re-locate/fly you out.  US citizen? 
Hey guys.  So i rearranged my ring and then it started working (got my ass beat about 10 times in a row lol)  In the process I accidentally broke my Ring of Favor and Protection.  Big loss? It was kinda annoying. 
&gt; Also for what it's worth if Apple pulled out of China their former Chinese employees would be far far far far far far worse off for it.  That's quite the ethical dilemma that I was never able to answer myself.  Is it morally right for a wealthy company from a wealthy country to export their production to a country with weaker labour laws and pay a monumentally lower wage than they would pay in their home country?  The classic example is sweat shop workers making brand name clothing.  On the one hand, they are produced in the poorest countries and sold in the richest, exploiting the lowest wage they could possibly find.  On the other hand, those very same workers often consider that factory job to be their lifeline, and without it they could be far worse off.
They'd have to have separate sprites from the normal IDPD troops.
My mom has cited that line as an example of shitty man-romance since 1980.
What are you currently feeding him? Make sure he drinks a lot of water but if he's anything like mine and doesn't drink water, feed him wet meals and add extra water in to it. Two of my boys have UTI/blockages/problems so I know all too well the troubles!   Tell your mother she needs to get him examined asap. Otherwise he could die, and IMO if she's okay with that then she really shouldn't think about having any animals at all.   Hopefully you can somehow get him to the vet, sooner rather than later. :(
He's Asian, he can do this easily /s
all i remember is watching when they started to make leeway and shit and my brother was like "the fuck is going on" and i was like  "these kids were like 'we gotta play this game' so they played the game  then they were like 'we gotta leave the game' so now they gotta get outta the game"  SAO
Contradicting what I wrote, I actually do think I'm worth it in a lot of ways. I just, at this age... I had one girlfriend the entire time I was in college, and that was only for a few months. At this age, it's even harder to meet women. It's hopeless by my estimation. 
My daughter has a 2DS and I have a 3DSXL, we both have Smash Bros, and we've been approved by the Mrs to get one amiibo each a month. I know there will be a Skylanders style adapter at some point, but we want to start our collection early.  All that being said, where is the best place to pick them up? All we have locally is Wal-Mart which does have a few, but not many and not often.
A very good friend of mine just found out the (very much wanted) fetus she is carrying has Trisomy 18. She and her husband made the difficult decision to terminate on Monday. She is an emotional wreck but made this decision out of compassion. But please, continue making these ignorant comments about a subject in which you know nothing of. I may be classless in your eyes but I will never judge another woman for making this decision, based on what is best for her and her family.
Use the no bite hold when he bites and hold him on his back until he submits!(usually they will sigh and stop struggling but every ferret is different) do this anytime he bites harder than you think is okay. If you have to do it 20 times every time you play with him, thats okay, just keep at it and you will see results
Not to mention announcing details and launching the PTR for the next patch, and out of control power creep that will render many current builds obsolete.
Attention citizens! Since the [glorious revolution](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/30xyff/occupyaskreddit/), all comments/posts from capitalist users (those who have gold) will be removed by me!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
My name is sage in real life and lamename47 on clash. I've been clashing for 2 years now and really wish I had gemmed 5 builders immediately. My clash goal is to max my lab as fast as possible and get hella 6 Star Wars.  Outside of clash my biggest hobby is Mtn biking, with longboarding and fixing my bike after I crash it a close second. I work at a major drive in chain and I'm finishing up my senior year in high school. I live in Idaho.
That will be $8 for mentioning the State.
MUJERES!
its april fools
Now bring it to Tripwire, and eat it outside their door. Menacingly.
Who caaaares. We're set for the draft now.
Thanks for the info! When you say "new Mac" are you referring to the actual newer one that I am returning or the "new" one that I need to transfer the files to? Also, How much memory would I need on the USB drive? is there a way I can look up how much memory all my files are taking up? again, sorry I am so technologically challenged... 
Ahaha right
Force and Bridges Criminal complaint  http://www.justice.gov/sites/default/files/opa/press-releases/attachments/2015/03/30/criminal_complaint_force.pdf
Execute Order 66
What do you think about required ID at polling centers?
Aubrey Plaza thought my Birthday didn't exist :,(
Strange first time I tried it it went blank like I already registered that code, then after I tried again  it said it was used.  That sucks. Thanks for the awesome giveaway!
Except if you have a well diversified portfolio over the long run you are virtually guaranteed decent returns 
&gt; And for $5.50 more an hour, we could afford marines.   And what makes you think that someone being a Marine makes them more likely to run into a gas fire?
According to the *Battle of Red Mountain* by Vivec, the Dwemer and the Chimer formed an alliance and fought the Nords.   Historians dispute greatly whether or not the Gods were punishing Nord for their misuse of the the Thu'um. 
Did they see your Eiffel Tower? 
Just posted this video in another thread, but it seems appropriate here.  [Dad joke duel.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MepBeEpEQcM)
So it begins...
"log"   The base of the log can be determined by context. It's not like computer scientists go around saying "log base two of....." the base of the logarithm is assumed when speaking. 
This gives me great joy. I didn't know people could think fabric softener was revolting
I was expecting a different Astrid but this is amazing!!! Love the weapon. 
culprate- tentacle vip     mr goldy - steppa      kursa - step to     bumble_ - salam libnan    aio - crash reset    mute speaker - kuy teav  tipper - whomi     so many more! gosh   
Idk man, I just moved here a couple months ago and compared to my last home the people you interact with (cashiers, waiters, etc) are WAY ruder. 
Didn't Emma talk to Norma about having sex with dude who's name is escaping me right now last season?
Some great commercials on MSG... help children survive rocket attacks in Israel and save a tortured puppy on the same day!
WTF IS WITH ALL THIS SPAM AND WHY IS NO ONE SAYING ANYTHING ABOUT IT!?
Never mind.http://imgur.com/8QI9Fke It looks like everyone else's.
# #FreedIncarnati0n
It probably will.
**HYPE**
TL;DR The vanguard may not be in the 'facsist' six yard box, but you're certainly in the penalty area. And I'd want nothing to do with it.
Border Patrolman says "Everybody's doing it!"
Honestly, it's an uphill battle. Narset is one of the most powerful generals in EDH.  I would focus on red's board wipes to deal with Narset and walkers. [[Earthquake]], [[Magmaquake]], [[Ashling the Pilgrim]], [[Breath of Darigaaz]], [[Flamebreak]], and many more. Note that you can redirect player damage to take out planesewalkers.  Unfortunately, you'll need a ton of these wipes to beat Narset with any consistency.  Another way to win is resource denial. [[Boil]] and the anti-white one. Blow up his mana rocks with artifact removal like [[Shattering Spree]]. Counter his spells with [[Red Elemental Blast]] and [[Pyroblast]].  Basically, you have to tune your deck specifically to beat Narset if you want a shot. That should be an indicator how skewed the matchup is.
why not both? unless you're implying that Uber and common decency are mutually exclusive
YOU WANNA DO THE HORIZONTAL HOKEY POKEY WITH SOME FRESHMAN 15's?
Oh no, not yet. I've played DnD before though (second campaign is currently running actually), and I've roleplayed in various games and sites prior. So I've dealt with the various player types personally from a player's perspective, but never as a game runner.  I fell into the "Stealing everything" trope with my rogue, but I almost never went through with it. It was more of a running joke in the first campaign where I'd ask the DM "But can I steal it?". Apart from that, I just tried to balance roleplaying and playing the game.  But we did have a griefer. They seemed hellbent on trying to make the game miserable for the rest of us. There was one who would refuse to speak out of character, just to troll everyone, and would even loudly make sounds  for everything (doors, walking, horses, even chewing. The chewing was the worst).  Character stereotypes are super easy to deal with compared to player stereotypes. Plus, some of them are just plain fun (like the zealot paladin or bloodthirsty barbarian). Whether good or bad, a character can be guided into a role. Players, however, are as good or bad as they choose to be (for the most part).  EDIT: I forgot my original point! What I mean in my previous comment was that I would create a party of players, and have those created players create characters. So I'd have Min/Maxers, Griefers, over the top roleplayers, hack-n-slashers, "Rule of Cool" ones, and also good or balanced players. I need to know how to deal with the good and the bad (especially the bad) if I'm going to try and deal with the people I have available to play DnD with!
Muh Flair
You mean out of anus?
I like that idea, definitely along with the hefty fine for running a red. I wouldn't mind seeing that used over here in the states but wouldn't doubt a lot of people would start taking off pretty quickly during the red/yellow
奴は呪われた古巣の居残り組 つーか受け入れてくれるとこがどこにもない
It's a half bathroom. (But it does have a cat genie that sounds like a TARDIS.)
OOOOOOOH SHIT, HERE WE GO!
Now imagine Neo pronouncing it.  &gt;......... -Neo
Link?
This team has no sense of urgency. If they lose tonight I don't see them making the playoffs.
"steam engine of course" - well, at least it could be part of a steam engine. Where's the boiler? Are you sure it's not a compressor? Where'd you get it?
/r/lol mods signed nda with riot  they also take bribery in the form of "extra swag" from riot so thye remove anti-riot content
Because one is based on facts the other is based on faith. I know there is dna.... I don't have to do experiments to prove this because others have.  
I thought that the dragons where just a representation of the size and force of the skill, as in, their isnt really twin dragons if that makes sense. But that seems to be debunked looking at the skill description.
No reason to risk anything, with the 1st seed being clinched and being 4.5 games ahead of the Hawks
Did the rebels ever evacuate Horlivka? Donetsk? Lugansk? At least Ukraine had the sense to evacuate *once it became clear* that it was no minor offensive.  &gt;You have to decide whether it is a crime to deploy troops in a city or to bomb it. If the first is then Ukraine was committing a crime in Debaltseve. If the second is then Ukraine was committing a crime in Donetsk.  Apples and oranges. False equivalency. Ukraine tried to evacuate Debaltseve, and doesn't seem to have kept its heavy artillery in the city.  No matter how you shape it the rebels always look bad.
Brush your teeth, stupid.
***Analyzing Gavin425***  * comments per month: 15  * posts per month: 3  * favorite sub [Club_Nintendo](http://NP.reddit.com/r/Club_Nintendo) * favorite words: /u/trollabot, codes, You'll * age 0 years 1 months  * profanity score 0% *^Gosh ^darnet ^gee ^wiz* * trust score 40.6% *^Lies!! ^so ^many ^lies!*
I have to go with Kosar out of pure emotional attachment. He was the QB I grew up watching. 
I did. When you do it doggy style it makes everything tighter.
&gt;For ~~some~~ a staggering amount of people... 
Yeah, I read the article and criticized this sub for allowing the source. I mean really? How pertinent was it to have the cheesy little bio about the Tanner family? Clearly biased.   And here I am down voted and still having to defend a true statement.  Perhaps you are too new to remember when gunnit was a major brigaded on the verge of getting banned for it. While they no longer coordinate brigades, the voting activity is always more polarized and heavier when it's a gun thread.  There is never an anti gun post on this sub. Any articles about shootings will have threads with identical shapes to this thread. I have looked at it and I have paid attention.   You really can't deny this in good faith. 
That is NOT a tapeworm. Tapeworms are flatter and segmented, not round.
So are you keeping up? How so?
Is there any sort of enchantment or illusory effect that could make her appear to be clothed/armored to make it more comfortable for you to play?   It kind of sounds like your GM knows it makes you uncomfortable but maybe he is a little too excited about having some badass hot chick running around nude to fulfill his own fantasies.
I would ruin you for anyone else 
ouch got punched
Relevant username.
That's the point, this video has no place in this sub. This was just one human being putting another in their place,  nothing to do with a "pussy pass", it just so happened that she was a woman. None of he actions or words came close to a "pussy pass" attempt.  If it was a guy he would have got the same response.  The first rule of this sub states *"THIS IS NOT /R/BEATINGWOMEN. We are not misogynists. Race is also irrelevant. If a clear pussy pass is not attempted, the post will be removed."*  No pussy pass was attempted here, yet the post is front page. Are we just hating on women now? 
posted some
taking the heart out of my throat now
I faded BroLo- wish me luck
"Blitzes aren't just tasers, and they've got more range than you think. Dusken's got a shotgun, but he's our medic, so he'll probably be keeping his head down."
No I wish, I just didn't say that right. I didn't wear deodorant when I met him. Then, one day we went on a hike and he told me on our way home that if I didn't start wearing deodorant he wouldn't see me anymore. So I bought and wore deodorant. 
But how did that put Lemerio Trading in debt? When did they make a deal with Lawrence to buy his armor?
Conor talks shit all the time but after the fight he never speaks about the figher again. All this build up is to get the upper hand mentally and after watching all the embeddeds, its clearly working.
Or their human bodies came with out souls. It seems to be a common problem with the recent generation.
You're making silly assumptions. Really this guy has violent power over people to rob them for as much as he can, then they (after being robbed) expect him to hire people to fix/repair things.  If they stop being violently robbed, the "services" used to cover up the violent robbery stop being requested.  ---  Instead, *each individual* could pay a regular fee to some repair guys (insurance, replacement, etc) without being violently controlled.  ie, they would pay for actual work &amp; insurance, not being violently "managed" by this parasite.
Just sommon help gee
Nice! This is probably my answer. Since the wood has already been cut, would it be best to go ahead and carve it as soon as possible and then apply this? Or apply this and then carve it possibly at a later time? 
oh shit, completely missed that xD thanks 
This happened in 2002, and she was a minor. 
Wait that was the finale....that's pretty meh then....
if you don't want your information tracked, you probably shouldn't be using the internet. 
I've found the McMillan calculator to be insanely accurate for just about everything except the marathon, where it generally predicts 5 minutes fast consistently. So it seems pretty reliable for me in my personal experience.  I agree on both training with others and tempo runs being very valuable.
Works for me :)
Why is smith with zibby and ryan?
Oh I don't have one. They showed it on TSN
If you want it to be faster, you could do Stanya x Mundeok x Kreimheld, but again you'd need a good set of weapons... and also Kreimheld lol 
[is ok :)]
Nashvegas....
The big thing to remember on possession charges they don't really care if the searches are legal, they really just want to get you to snitch.  
I used to have oily skin and it has become a lot drier since I started using tretinoin. 
That would be brilliant. Tonight? 
Half Life 3
Then MJ's MVPs should be taken away since his team was very, very good without him, probably better than most teams *with* their stars. 
Jailor: Ask someone role and have them say nothing or claim an evil role.  Execute them and they are town.  Mayor: Reveal, ask for people to whisper roles, no one listens to you.  Spy: Reveal, ask people to whisper test you, no one listens to you.  Survivor: Get revealed by an investigator or Consig's will and then have mafia or a neutral killer kill you at night.  Disgusier: Being disguiser.
*The bite becomes harder as he cums, groaning loudly.*
Hello and welcome! :D  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fforeveralonebots) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I see. Well GL with your sale, you can use either of my offers as a C/O =)
Welp, she sued someone and they LOST so... wait... is she... is she seriously Googling what she sued someone for???  Righttt...
You see your liquid holding receptacle floating.  ...wait, that can't be right.  You look again.  You see your liquid holding receptacle floating.  AGH!  You try to catch the receptacle! Where is it going to? Do all alien receptacles float? Yours never did when Ma was swimming/floating in it. You are not entirely sure whether to be scared, amused, or try to use the floating receptacle as a basketball hoop. If you knew what basketball was.  Let's go with the third option. You toss one of the rocks into the receptacle. SCORE! It makes an unholy racket.
We should probably make windshields out of something  stronger,  like armoured glass...   Just make sure you wear your seatbelt... 
/r/thathappened 
"I'm sorry Dave I'm afraid I can't do that"  "My name's not Dave."  "I'm sorry Dave"
And his leadership reminds you of a late career Mark Messier
Tuberculosis
It's different to think that if I was a girl I'd have beef curtains.
you cant do it huh so you down vote me?   thats ok! some people advance, others stay the same. 
For me I would say chicken quarters. I get 12-14 of them for $10 or less at my local Mexican Market. 
Yes, the logic does hold. If not for the Church teaching the Bible is inspired by God, I *would in fact* dismiss it. Your "slippery slope problem" is not actually a problem, since all doctrines of Catholicism are true and not "off the deep end". If one were shown to be false (again, impossible), then it *would* make sense to reject both Catholicism and the Bible entirely.  Essentially your reasoning is :  1. If the Bible depends on the Church. 2. And the Church teaches an error as doctrine. 3. Therefore, the Bible becomes suspect.  Just because you don't like the conclusion is not a reason to deny the first premise (especially when the second premise is false).
The announcement of the first event said it was annual and they had done events for every holiday for Dota and TF2 for years.
Hells ya bruh.  I am hooking up with some Oreos, cheez its, and orange Gatorade.  
This bloke thinks all PPV point deals are the same.  Top giggle.
They go on and off for me. However co-op seems broken for me, never seem to be able to join anyones game easily, and in certain places (BSB) it disconnects you if you ring resonant bell and don't find a match.
Yea. 2015 is looking pretty good as well but the party is going to end eventually.
No, I certainly don't know, but it says it gives you mewtwo on both systems so I'm not sure why the code wouldn't work to be registered on 1 wii u and 1 3ds.
I don't know where to start and frankly it isn't worth my time. Just because you are in the right, doesn't mean you have every reason to carry on regardless.   That time when you tried to overtake a car that was turning left on a main road when all you needed to do was drift and you would have kept pace with the car?   Or that time you arrive in a bus's blind spot instantly and you expect him to stop? He's lucky that you did. He was sitting in traffic for 2 minutes and you just appear in his blindspot and you shout at him as if he's in the wrong? 
Very much looking forward to it!
You had just 2 and a half lines, I'm not so stupid that I would reply without reading the whole thing, neither am I blind.
Wouldnt it be awesome if one of these panned out,   and the dude that was looking for his "buddy" just straight up punches the dude says fuck you and walks off. 
A faggot weeaboo with shit taste downvoted this.
So how much would you say you gave Valve?
For me, it's when he's filming backwards down the fairway, especially when it's a really short hole. Makes me bonkers, because you have absolutely no frame of reference for the second shot, or any idea of how good a drive it may or may not have been.
Mario Williams 
Anytime!
[Oh it's a word](http://i.word.com/idictionary/irregardless). But I say it purposely to be a douche bag and to make a joke to myself. 
I maintain that many of the jobs I find are of respectable quality and payment.   I think its sort of incorrect to think that you will be able to start freelancing and immediately start making huge bucks without preexisting contacts and work experience.   I think odesk/elance are perfectly viable options for those starting from scratch basically 
How many of those were "games" and how many times were you whinning about gender roles instead of the gameplay?
We also don't hear national news talking about, say, a cop shooting a robber in Pawtucket, RI.
Ja sam za malo drugačiju varijantu - prvo se naučiti fotkati s "lošom" opremom pa kad napreduješ, onda kupovati dalje. To each his own valjda. I kako sam pogodio ime? :D Znam za jednog Hrvoju Prpića - Business Angel, osnivač HG Spota.
I understand you. I wish I had this functionality, "play folder". It is easier to just copy my fave music folders to the phone than go by artist/category/etc.  One folder for 'driving music', one for 'mood music' etc makes more sense for me.
It's understandable
Damn dude, you got level 15 but I have you tagged as a nonpayer on /r/millionairemakers. Why?  EDIT: you paid in full: http://www.reddit.com/r/millionairemakers/comments/2x85da/the_sincerest_thanks_that_i_can_wholeheartedly/cp1c2ce
The same fighter planes that can get completely destroyed from a bit of a tree falling on it?   Accuracy doesn't matter much if the person just isn't where you throw it. 
Okay, number one. Darwin's tenets have been incredibly bolstered by 150 years of evidence, to the point of being nigh irrefutable, and a significant number of proto and ancient humans have been found exactly where they should be found right from the times they should have originated. Also, equating ideologies attempting to quash human rights (evangelical Christians) with those who protest such gross injustices (secular humanists/atheists)? Fuck right off, m8
Dash button?
Does Franklin's pocket universe exist outside of the multiversal incursions that are occurring these days, because current Strange has been doing a bit of traveling. 
This show got great... in a flash.
...why...exactly...?
I don't understand. Are you just trying to ask "Who is?" louder?
[Ah the old reddit parkbencharoo](http://www.reddit.com/r/technology/comments/30x3yc/att_charges_more_for_fiber_internet_if_googles/cpwvfv7?context=3)
[Original post](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/30yry1/)
on a semi-unrelated note, i'm pretty sure nobody on earth knew what lapis lazuli or obsidian was until minecraft.
Have watched it. Are annoying. Part of the premise of the show is the nonsense logic but that's what I hate the most about it and the number one perpetrator is [](/s "was") Kamina. He is SO damn annoying but everyone loves him for some reason. I feel like had they gave him a less over the top attitude I could have liked him but he was a retard and ruined part of the show.
3x US, 2x 5k mana  zzzzz I'd rather have had a 1 wish 15 crystals.....
I'm as big of a Gilmour fan as they come, but he wasn't the one to come up with that quote. He just sang it.
"Ah, here it is, November2002resumay.txt"
Non cross-fit people usually call it a shitty pull-up
Wait it's the Saudis bombing Yemen not Israel. 
i just make a room for what ever key quest i need to do as a farming room and run it a few times because i never know when i'll need the parts.
If your submission had supported that you'd have a point. Nothing you submitted had the word feminist and your only stated rationale was that the fats identify as feminists. The argument you're trying to make can be made, but not with the weak sauce you're posting.
turn off arm lock
But you have to manually cast them and thus they do not benefit from attack speed. Or at least not much.
I haven't played multiplayer anywhere near as much as some others but I've dabbled a fair bit so I can give a few pointers.  1. Connection works by ringing bells, items that can be found in the Hunter's Dream. The first is the beckoning bell, which can be found on the ground after getting your first insight point. To use it costs you 1 insight, and allows you to summon other players who ring small resonating bells. You have to be geographically close on the map as well as in a similar level range. The summon range is supposed the same as the DS formula so it's something like (Your level±10)±10%  The other bells are the small resonating bell and sinister bell, both are bought from the insight shop in the Hunter's Dream which only shows up when you have at least 10 insight, both items cost 1 insight to buy. The resonating bell lets you be summoned and the sinister bell lets you invade.  When you use the beckoning bell you also trigger a bell maiden to appear, this bell maiden spawns somewhere on the map and rings a sinister bell, allowing you to be invaded. You can kill the bell maiden to stop the sinister bell from ringing. Bell maidens also appear naturally in some areas.  When ringing a sinister bell you can be summoned by someone who has rung the beckoning bell with the bell maiden still alive or be summoned by someone else who has rung the sinister bell.  When using the resonating bell if you kill the boss of the area you get 1 insight, for the sinister bell you get 1 insight for killing the enemy player. No souls are lost when dying in the world you are summoned to.  You can fire the silencing blank (given along with the beckoning bell) to stop the ringing of a bell. It also lets you send back allied summons and lets you remove yourself from a world you've been summoned to or invaded.  Setting up a password allows you to be summoned by specific people, although it appears to still be a bit buggy in some cases.  Something else to note is that all summons have around a 30% health penalty and are also scaled down to the beckoner's level.  2. Somewhat, you just need to be within level range to be summoned, the range is bigger in higher levels. A general rule of thumb I would say is increments of 10 levels for every non optional boss. Being around that general range should ensure you can summon or be summoned.   3. You can find coop summons pretty much anywhere, usually by bonfires/lanterns or before a fog gate  4. PVP seems to be more [popular in the later stages of the game, especially places with a terrain advantage to the Invader because monsters won't attack them. Places with the most invaders seem to be Yahar'gul (when you go there after Byrgenwerth) and Nightmare of Mensis. Note that when invading a lot of the time it's 1v2 or 1v3 plus you have a hp penalty which makes it even more difficult.  There's also chalice dungeons but cooping is extremely inconvenient there. All players have to have already unlocked the dungeon and use the same glyph code to coop. I haven't played coop in chalice dungeons so there isn't much I have to say on it.  Another important thing to mention is that when a player who is in the Executioner/Vileblood covenant summons a player from the opposite covenant, they appear as enemies instead. Not sure about Hunter of Hunter's, it may be hostile to both covenants. 
Depends on your field obvi, but generally it's really tough out there right now. Best way to get a job right now is to know someone who can get you an interview. I'm lucky that I can support myself working full time at my job I worked throughout my undergrad. I know many other people who are in this same predicament and continue to work at their same jobs they had throughout their undergrad. Advice: go to job fairs, look at the joblink EVERYDAY, keep your ear on the ground for openings, and don't give up. Prepare yourself for applying for 50 jobs and not hearing from any of them back. Make sure your resume/cover letter is supreme - people who are hiring look through thousands of resumes every day, make sure they don't toss yours out for something as seemingly as trivial as formatting. In the meantime,  if you are able to, volunteer somewhere in your field/where you would like to work/somewhere you can learn a skill. I know lots of people who would volunteer for an organization and then get a job for them.   Lemme know if you need anymore advice. You can PM me if you want.
I don't think Wacha's 2013 was luck, but I don't expect him to make more than a few starts :/ I hope he proves me wrong but shoulder injuries are a huge bitch.  Also, it's funny how Lynn has turned into the model of consistency after how much everyone complained about him his first couple of years.
You just lost a leg, chill out.
[Here is a video of how this happens](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IA15sVL_ZRk)
Honest question?   Is there any way to get a cheap seat on a cargo 747?  (like how you can get a cheap cruise on a freighter)
http://peernova.com/   Reach out to Emmanuel Abiodun and Benjamin Gorlick
Yeah, it's this. I noticed it a few months ago.
He's been watching too many FIFA Goal of the Week videos on YouTube.
Causation does not equal correlation. There is no evidence provided to directly show these two are related. Planned Parenthood is not the only place to get tested either.
What!!! Nice catch. 
Not really.
&gt;But that's the difference between wanting art and wanting propaganda.   considering that most of them now believe video games can make you sexist, all media is considered propaganda by their standards, which then makes it imperative for them to tell us what is acceptable and what isn't.
Thank you! Is there anything that you think that I should change about it?
I had no idea!
It's not uncommon as a strategy, but it's not by and in itself valuable. For starters your initial bet needs to be value either way. If it's not, you won't be able to turn a profit hedging longterm.  And your hedge bet itself should be value or at least close 0%, otherwise you're really just throwing money away.
Ah! Hello there dear brother of mine. *He gives a bow.* 
Where'd you go?
That's.. not good
But perhaps the most iconic image of all, maybe all of MMA, is Joe Stevenson, post BJ Penn fight, crying and covered in blood.
I don't understand what's creepy about this.
it will be 60 fps but im not sure about 4k...
I'm going to need you to stay on that side of the counter.
Apple isn't simply just one of many players in the game. They are known for being the most ruthless and powerful. This creates even more hardship on foreign workers compared to less ruthless and less powerful competitors. Apple strong arms China companies to an extreme degree which hurts workers in China. Also knowing Reddit it doesn't surprise me users are taking head in the sand approach or even defending a terrible corporation like apple. Just like your average Reddit going on about the environment while at the same time consuming with the best of them. Holier than thou hypocrites. 
Begin operation of mass-downvoting this post!.
春だ桜だエイポキル
Zinger!  Z gets no love. Thought I'd give it a chance to be the big letter on campus, if only for one day.
No, but seeing how 2 agents conspired together to commit crimes, I would say that this counts as a conspiracy.
1 year and 7 months but whos counting?
stfu kid u dont know me u ned to get new brai ncs old is fked up
Why does Urianger need to die? Because when everything is hitting the proverbial fan, an emissary asks to speak to him and he agrees to it? Engaging in talks with your enemy does not automatically make you one of them.
I'm allied with the Federation, Empire, Alliance, and the Ankh Guards.  next up, Yembo Interstellar!
&gt; I guess ultimately I do what I want, right? That's what this is all about, after all.  Bingo. Make the choice you think is most appropriate. Own your shit.  Personally, I'd play through since I've already fucked up. May as well own my own fuck ups as well. But personally, I'd probably mention what you've already said about the "core section" since it's such a succinct criticism. "I want to revisit blah blah blah" or if it doesn't matter "Wife. It doesn't matter to me."
HOIST
That drought to start the second half was so painful..  I keep playing the free throw scenario in my mind, too... if only.   Okay enough sadness for one night
Let's say 1 in 100 people are missing an eye. The average person then has 1.99 eyes. Therefore 99 out of the 100 have more than the average number of eyes. 
Why do you need heat? You have blankets you know.
Used to get these pressed pills when I was very young, I used to call them meth bombs as I'm sure there was meth in them, even suspect amounts because of how speedy they made you feel and then the MDMA which made me roll like mad.  But of course, who knows what was in them. 
Wasn't the MiG-25 built to intercept the XB-70?
ALL HAIL THE ONE TRUE KING OF WESTEROS!
please leave it? As much as I love my banana I must wear the phage
Okay cool. Really good to know. Thanks for the info man! 
I was praying to Helix that Meinshao didn't have fake-out
&gt; CHIM is most definitely divinity.  I suppose it depends on how you interpret the Walking Ways; I see them as paths to Amaranth, not to divinity in the context we've been discussing (which is a *lesser thing* than Amaranth). CHIM is, in my view, a path that bypasses established formulations of godhood rather than incorporating them like enantiomorph or mantling. Parallel to divinity, but not equal. On the other hand, from the average mortal perspective that's definitely splitting hairs!  &gt; "Waking up" isn't a danger  I'm very certain I remember MK remarking on their being two ways to fail at CHIM, and zero-sum was only one of them. I've been very certain of wrong things before, but that's my memory. :)  &gt; Molag Bal never knew CHIM, only of it.  This tickles a memory, so you're probably right, but I can't find a source. Everything I remember clearly is ambiguous, which tells me nothing because in TES lore *everything* is ambiguous...
Alright, I've added you as a friend and my gate is open. The -F means first come, first serve.
H
Dear angry people.....  Take a look at what day it is/is about to be.  Even if I'm wrong, what's the big deal?  Just be glad that we can now post all our Serena Williams pics.
I have noticed some needles have filters built in. Is anybody knowledgeable about this?
But did he ... [you know](https://youtu.be/2A_n_zwIZk4)?
[Build Complete] Midas Touch
He did! And also apparently something bit me.  
made it to the first somehow :D
Please god let this be April fools....
I would be interested in seeing this poll include Canadians for the sake of the NHL. I'm both surprised and not surprised to see them dipping into the Republican side of the chart.
Luden's isn't an on-hit effect though. It's a spell effect.
No problem with him being a shitty host but any beef with the okiwanan dojos? Invalidating the entire documentary just because he appears in that video...
How do you sell Rousey not completely killing every Diva (at once) in about 30 seconds flat?
So hot and I love the lingerie! 
I concur. 
If hes a hero then russ is a god. Heat are 34-39 whereas okc is 42-32 and russ has arguably less help.
We're doing spoilers, not pro tips. 
Man Wings look sloppy. Not connecting on anything, can barely get out of our zone. You Sens have some aggressive forecheckers! Have you guys been playing that way for a while or was it since Cameron took over?
Let's go y'all!
For the past five years I've been taking hot showers (screen fogs up) with my phone. I'm in the shower as I type this! 
I just measured it and it is 180mmx100mm which is the measurements of double din. My car doesn't have a cup holder in it. It has the audio controls and then the info display above that. So I'm thinking it is actually double din?? I'm still looking for a cage/pocket that fits in. Can I just buy anything double din?
I see you advertising runescape.co not runescape.com &gt;.&gt;
Hey /u/catpirates!  If you could refrain from using other users as an example, that would be great. :) It might come of a little rude to them seeing their pictures here. :)
Generally from the Kings Cross Hippo Races
dump a mattress in their swimming pool
**Your comment has been gilded!**   ^^**from** ^^[**reddit**](http://www.reddit.com/user/reddit)  ^^**sent** ^^**just** ^^**now**   An anonymous redditor liked [your submission](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/1b4nob/megapost_what_are_your_best_past_or_future_prank/) so much that they gilded it, giving you reddit gold.   reddit gold is reddit's premium membership program. Here are the benefits:   * [Extra site features](http://www.reddit.com/gold/about) * [Extra perks](http://www.reddit.com/gold/partners) * Discuss and get help on the features and perks at /r/goldbenefits * Grab a drink and join us in /r/lounge, the super-secret members-only community that may or may not exist.   ***Did you know:*** *The word "gold" derives from the Old English word "gelo", which means "yellow".*
The company collects young mussels (it's a common species, not one of the really endangered ones), implants a seed, then grows them in mesh bags on racks for a few years out in the lake while the pearls develop.  They've been doing it for decades.
Pretentious assholes, they are just as bad as Arsenal and RM fans.
Thanks for doing your part!
I suppose Mike Pence 100%. Will vote for again 10/10. 
Low oil, low oil pressure, to heavy weight of oil, exhaust leak, valve wear, miss adjusted lifters, aluminum pistons in a cast block slap till their warmed up those are the most common ones.
Which MJ?
alright..alright..ill delete it. sorry
Classic Red Wings first period. :(
Our rules are clearly written, and at the top of the rules, and in the sidebar, and in the submission text that's listed on the submission page, the importance of reading and following all rules is emphasized. Our rules clearly state that our rules should be read and followed before participating. It gets very monotonous and repetitive correcting people making the same mistakes who didn't bother to take the time to read the rules. The deleting rule is in place because if someone was working on that for you, they can no longer find you and can no longer post their work if you delete it. The reposting rule is in place because we want all images to be fresh and inspirational for artists when they come by. It's not my job to be nice to you, it's my job to correct you and others who break the rules. Please read the rules before participating again.
Of course you don't have to concent but you can't stop the officer either so what can you really do besides taking it to court after he finds nothing. 
The good thing is that there are roles for women. Men just have to make the ultimate sacrifice, might not be too fair for men, being ordained is a great sacrifice for religion where other roles have less baggage. A lot of people must think it's like some form of presidency. 
the only thing that matters is what kind of mouse you have. optical mouse? its preference. laser mouse? you need a hard pad.
&gt; SV is permeated with the reek of dweebs who think they're finally cool because they're making a ton of money doing computer stuff  ahahahaha  Sounds like you're getting what you deserve.  "I can't believe those *dweebs* [insert sneer] have the audacity to have positive self-esteem based on their successful careers!" Guess you're really showing us, man!  &gt; At least from the outside looking in, Manhattan and LA industry people are moderately classy about having money, SV industry people aren't.  It also sounds like you're clueless. You think rich Hollywood and Wall St. types aren't into ostentatious displays of wealth? Really?  The money from your average SV/SF *dweeb* goes into paying the exorbitant housing costs present in the bay area. Yeah sure, we're generally paid very well, but the techies that get to live a wealthy lifestyle are a small minority (unless you count "had to pay $1 million for 3br house" as "living rich").
What is the matter with you Americans?   Try to change things so that your tax dollars are spent on the people's needs, rather than on things like foreign military expeditions and bases, and expensive military toys.   You are victims of the false beliefs that to spend money on your citizens is bad---and that the money should go to big banks and mega corporations.  Wake up!
Im on mobile, could you help me out with a link to the db?
Real's biggest problems with their defender's is their defending. They tend to forget that's what they're meant to be focused on.
Damn it all, really wish it could be with the biggest movie of the year, and a fellow comic book movie (even if it's Marvel).   The entire theater would collectively explode in their pants before the movie even began if they showed Star Wars, Ant Man, Batman vs Superman, etc. all during the trailers. 
I'm pissed. They tell you that you're about to watch the throw but they changed the video to some crap about should the Buccaneers trade their #1 pick. 
Thanks, and I do try to rationalise this to myself With everything you just said but it still nags at the back of my mind that I shouldn't be doing anything to lose the boobs. Also amen on the fucking clothes thing. 
Yes but most people feel that BART workers are uneducated and undeserving of their pay level.  I think they are paid a fair wage and I don't malign them for not having the education of a salaried worker.  I am pretty liberal and I think often people take for granted their education/middle-class upbringing.  I understand that it is often hard to make it and work at a Google/Apple/Facebook but people take more credit than credit is due.  I really believe that a good portion of success is not in small part to your background. It is easy to think of a person as lazy/stupid when you do not have the context of their upbringing.
I have a volcano and a pax. I would recommend not a pax. I have a friend who complains about issues with the ascent's glass stem. He's apparently broken two, one got stuck. I have since told him to stick his ascent in the refrigerator to cool it off before he tries to pull the glass stem out. Heat makes it expand. Cold makes it shrink.
You should let their higher ups know about this.  AOD has strict do not TK policies in effect.  
8-1 in shots... Umm guys... Wake the FUCK up!
Cant seem to find any but this is what a building would look like inside  http://cdn-ak.f.st-hatena.com/images/fotolife/h/hanecci/20131204/20131204195856.jpg  note that each room has a light source, wall texture, ceilng texture, and floor texture, and that the rooms are properly aligned with perspective.
Don't touch anything that has to do with the LGBT or the whole abortion boondoggle. The ultra-socially liberal will be all over it like flies on faeces and by extension you if you don't take the ultra-socially liberal position on either topic. 
No, it is the entire US labor force.
Ah ok. I talked to my vendor today and it's releasing here this week
Yea maybe I can use my other fingers. 
Wanna learn Rust with me?  It's new as hell and all that, but it's neato.
get a surface 3 - new, its ~$500
/Oblg. 1st world problems.  Shoot the messenger, ignore the message. :-/
[Adventurer glasses](http://i.imgur.com/c0Fk92F.jpg)
I got it in a dvd+bluray combo pack at Best Buy, so it's definitely not a Walmart exclusive
That's pretty much what happened to me. If it's not fixed in a couple of days, check up on it - they said they created a case for me last Wednesday, but apparently they screwed up while doing it which is why mine hasn't been fixed yet.   I hope it gets working for you soon!
Hail the SNAIL!!
edit: as usual, supporters of other parties so set in their ways they can't hope to debate. So they downvote and move on. Suppress alternative opinions right? Scumbags, this is precisely why less and less people vote   Sure man,  have you read their manifesto? When you ignore media spin against most parties and do your own reading and don't just listen to buzzword insults like Marxist, (labour), racist, rich bankers (cons) etc it all becomes much more human. Anyway the ukip manifesto is very common sense. The only single solitary policy I could disagree with was that of the climate change questioning. Farage doesnt get as much of a platform because idiots shout him down and cut his airtime short. But honestly,  objectively watch some of his interviews on YouTube. I like the man,  I like 99% of the policies.  In this country we cry out for change and plain spoken politicians doing common sense things with common sense policies.  So it is so amazing to me that a man who unashamedly embodies that bluntness and friendly honesty is so heavily refuted by supporters from the two main parties as if his existence was a personal insult. Or perhaps this is precisely why.   I could go into detail for any aspect of you would like? I don't mind. I try not to be factionsl with my voting. So this year I want to vote ukip to try and force a coalition or at least a minority government here they have a voice on things. The conservatives would probably be best this time to continue their economic work.  As it is truly going well. In 5 years time we can then probably vote in a labour government to then spend some of the surplus on groups that may need it most.  Once that 5 years is up,  back to another government to tidy up the economic side and so on,  depending on what is needed. I don't like the idea of people getting closed minded and only voting one way.  A bit about me. I'm in my late 20s. I've lived in over 10 countries so I have had a first hand experience in seeing what works and doesn't regarding a lot of policies. I have a computer science degree.  I'm pretty well off now after graduating and getting a good job but I come from a family that was terribly affected by the financial crisis and was for a few years very poor. Though I had a pretty amazing education abroad so I can't complain.   Anyway one thing I always stress to people.  Britain has a huge issue with political correctness. People who call ukip racist are doing it to silence discussion. British doesn't mean white anymore,  but more importantly there is a concept of having skilled migrants and unskilled migrants. The former are great,  they are your Syrian doctors and businessmen, physicists and economists. The latter are a waste of space in Britain. It isn't racist to want to limit the unskilled migrants. I could have a pretty deep discussion about this and also point out that surveys say unskilled migrants haven't made unemployment worse,  but that this fails to take into consideration that when they take unskilled jobs it means that they fill a position an unemployed person could have had,  thus they don't make it better. Further instead of citizens getting paid more when a crap job with crap pay comes up and nobody will fill it. Companies can abuse our system to farm in someone desperate and unskilled from abroad who will simply put up with it. As a result wages in Britain are crap. 
Hey this sounds suspiciously familiar 
IDK if I am going to make that late night but Goddamn I am gonna be jealous when it is happening. Its literally gonna be a super set to top all jams. Scamp has got the right ideas this year!
GROSS
&gt;I wouldn't mind seeing the Downtown Streetcar Project resurrected, though I imagine spending regional transit money on that would be controversial, and it might fall on City of Vancouver to build that all on its own.  Until there end up being local buses as packed as the 99, I certainly don't hope to see streetcars.  They cost a great deal to build, and they cost a great deal to operate.  You *might* get a lower running cost per seat, but if buses could have handled the ridership you have then you're probably offering lower frequencies, which is all-in-all a service downgrade.  You're not going faster than a trolleybus. If we do ever build streetcars, I would rather not see the downtown streetcar plan revived either. Streetcars have many disadvantages, but the big advantage that they have is rail bias and capacity. So if you've got a relatively crowded downtown bus route (say, the 3, the 5, or the 6), and if you calculate that people like trains enough that you'd fill street cars at the frequency you run buses, then perhaps they'd make a reasonable business case, especially if you ran them in separated lanes. the NPA streetcar plan, was more about building a tourist tram to shuttle people to Granville Island and Pacific Boulevard and *that* strikes me as a waste of money, and one which I would hope the region would not be asked to support were it to ever surface again.  
LOL Beirut going on a vacation tour
kadris goal? id almost rather it be Lindstroms
As long as it's more than 0 I'll be happy.
any info about the wattage to the 12v rail (for the gpu)? the website just shows the amps for each part of the 12v rail but you cant just add them. thats not how it works. so find out the wattage for both parts of the 12 v rail together, then divide that by 12. that will be your amps for the gpu and you can see if its enough. doesnt reflect quality of psu but at least it will be giving enough power
You can read a few lines on it. There's an entry for $.22 and $.12. One $17 item was in only $.87!
All in all, a good series. However I have found one minor error.   &gt; “Easy Chains, I believe you, just haven’t seen him yet is all. But we’ve got other issues right now, so get that drill and get to work. Hoxton, cover the parking lot and make sure the drill is clear,” Hoxton answered.   Hoxton is ordering Hoxton around? Just something I found, edit at your own pleasure, although you have every right to refuse~
Personally, I like how retarded the spelling and grammar is getting. It makes it feel more visceral.
Its called Tucson, and I wish we would just give it back to mexico
The big problem here is you have to draw your tech card first. You have to draw your ooze, and have it not die until you can cast gang up on it.  I believe the odds of having your tech card, gang up, and the time to play it are too low to be worth the risk of running  it.
Holy shit Shawne Williams sucks
Could be but I'm pretty sure he's based in the south west.
Ahh, I wasn't expecting any trade requests at the moment so I've been chaining, so I probably didn't see your request. Sorry about that! I'll hop back online now.
I thought she didn't die she was just knocked unconscious? 
The only way this fight is going to be a let down is when one of them get injured and has to pull out. 
It's official.   We've been had.   beep boop.
That's not the same shirt, in fairness. It's probably Clashist.  They've done a James Franco one and a Ryan Gosling one that Ryan Gosling got caught wearing. I'd be careful about buying knockoffs. I'm on /r/tennis, and a big deal lately has been a famous Romanian player's new shirt from Adidas (Simona Halep), with the text "halepeño" on it. You can only buy it in Romania, so people have started selling knockoffs on eBay. Any idiot can get a t-shirt printed; not any idiot can get a good quality print job.
Urias is a cabra. 
There is this anti thumb sucking/ nail biting stuff you can buy. It goes on like nail polish and it's clear. Works wonders 
I alredy beat the elite four and got friend safari
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take"
This is cringeworthy as fuck
Neither does he.
It's unbelievable that even though that line is 20 years old, it's still funny even though pogs are such a short lived trend. 
Just traded it two min ago, sorry again xc
Dammit, I just deleted Sins off my computer like a week ago.
Ha I'm in the same boat! I just agreed to a trade for another one and don't have the need for two.  
Don't worry man. It's hard to beat a professional Karma whore. 
nah i'm pretty sure that's what he was talking about, the last d2l lan finals i'm pretty sure
It guarantees you an aging population, which strains social security networks tremendously.
The right not to be discriminated against by virtue of who you are or what you believe.  Sexual orientation isn't explicitly defined in the Civil Rights Act like race or sex but it sure as hell deserves to be.  As far as I'm concerned discrimination against homosexuality is just as condemnable as racism.  Freedom of religion and belief cannot extend to infringing upon basic civil liberties and being treated equally under the law to everyone else.
It never got finished, or they remade it. Something like that.
&gt;a job that ISIS pays you six figures  But getting fired takes on a whole different meaning...
Look for me, I'm the one in the Caps jersey.
I didn't know those existed! 
Don't buy on ebay, use a well known, trusted card selling site. I recommend http://www.tcgplayer.com/ personally, though I have heard good things of http://www.starcitygames.com/  Next it would help to know what cards he already has, which you can do easily by sneaking a peak at them. After which, use http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Default.aspx to find cards you think he would like.  It is simple enough if need be, simply search for a word like "dragon", pick the colors, then cross reference a card you think he would want on one of the card selling sites.  Hope this helps
By your name, you should check out Sky Bar
Lmao what's your reasoning. She has a spammable shield and her passive is always up. She's insanely mobile and still does tons of dmg. Cc is reduced as well.  In nurf she's the least affected by the ms and crit nerfs and she can still at least kill one guy with a full combo (probably).
sometimes it sucks being a poor college student. ive been there. 
Why? Is karma a precious resource?
thanks dude!
Glad to hear you had a good experience! It is a bummer Chattahoochee Brewing Company doesn't keep more of their own stuff on tap, they're friends of ours, but we really would love to try more of their own stuff. Having said that, like you said, they do have a pretty great lineup of guest beers most of the time. 
No really, get your shit out of here
Owl bear,  pm me
don't be silly, it was aliens made of pure oil. They bury themselves in barrels too after being processed
[Fallout 3 also](http://fallout.wikia.com/wiki/Fallout_3_cultural_references#Mad_Max)
Am I raping to the beat?   Edit: uh! Rapping
I also want to see a "hard" He Man film.  Battle Cat  biting people's heads off etc
then not really an issue for me.
Weight loss is about diet. She didn't eat at as large a deficit as he did.
I prefer rednecks to not be so loud about their souther pride. It offends me and my religion when they start bringing out their cheap beer, shotguns and camo hats....see how ridculous that fucking sounds???
Is that mold growing out of it's leg?
I've had people with my name set up Facebook and Match accounts with my Gmail address, and I have no idea how they can do it since services usually require a confirmation email to complete the process.  I've always been able to reset their passwords, log in, and shut down the accounts.  Really annoying.
http://pages.ebay.com/link/?nav=item.view&amp;id=201321263002&amp;alt=web 
Santorin? Dexter? Trashy? Alex Ich? Amazing? Impaler? Jesiz?  Successful or not it's not just a single occurrence and if i'm honest it's ruining regional rivalry :C
All-in on Finn, the clutchmaster
Public? 
check on /r/legaladvice this sub is generally not for personal issues with legal matters 
sent! C:
Yuri is purist form of love, there is nothing kinky about it.  
Damn, I had a mini Heart attack
Me too, but [shooting pets seems to be a thing out here](http://www.torontosun.com/2014/05/12/culprit-sought-after-cat-shot-with-air-rifle). I don't have a lot of hope that they'll catch this fucker.
[IT'S HAPPENING](http://vignette2.wikia.nocookie.net/rwby/images/c/c7/Vol2_Nora_ProfilePic_Prom.png)
Too cute! :D 
Yeah exactly. If the Warriors dropped 9 games back in the standings, they'd still be the #1 seed. If the #2 seed or #3 seed Grizzlies dropped 9 games back, they'd be out of the playoffs. Thats great curry has elevated the Warriors. 
[Goodreads is owned by Amazon](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goodreads).  It could be said that Amazon uses Goodreads to to track demand, improve sales, forecast future demand and so on.  In addition, Amazon has no problem removing the worst of readers reviews calling them 'author bullying'.
We should suffer? Why?! 
who the hell is that guy talking to on the phone ? who the fuck would care about that? lol
I'm also a big fan of Seeker of the Way, especially in Dega, I find I can reliably get him into a 3/3 or 4/4, especially with lingering souls. The lifelink has always been a great addition.  What did you replace the Soulfire Grand Masters with?
Hells yea it does! 
How my comment then lead to this comment I have no idea.
That speech.....shivers. 
And that is why you will never catch up to the EU scene.  Kappa
It's not enough to make the text blue, the links themselves must *also* support what you're saying... Which they don't really. It's mostly a link to people saying the same as you do, but they don't have scientific backing either, so we're just as far...  As for your last link, which is to a proper paper, they don't actually conclude that burning has driven up prices, as there isn't enough evidence for that. What it says is that it is possible and we should consider the possibility.   In other words, your own source finds that your claim doesn't have enough evidence behind it. 
If you think Ryan (Bobby?) is bad, I think you need to re-evaluate your hockey viewing. 
I know there wouldn't be government, but that is what I want.
Wings have been missing a lot of their shots, Tatar just rang one off the post
It always starts with a visit to Craigslist.
I hope this makes the employees feel a bit better, nobody that works in a service industry deserves that kind of shit.
Except they would still lose money due to inflation. They could have done something else with the 200k they loaned you in the thirty years you had it. They still lose money even if you pay them back in full. 
Thanks for the detailed response. My weight lifter buddy said he loves his, always bragging about how man calories he's burned but my other buddy who does the iron mans was more into the watches for distance/elevation. 
Who is Mel's senpai? Madoka?
\&gt;standard English  \&gt;"Ebonics"  http://i.imgur.com/e2T8SlT.gif
That blows dude, any chance of getting a family member out of country to buy one and mail it to you?
Your beautiful socks, you dingaling.
K lol
Did he just say the Nashvegas?  Is that a thing?
First (and last) time I sat in the bleachers, Brewers fans were cheering and the guy in front of me threatened to kick their ass. Like really dude?
